https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1976_Chowchilla_kidnapping
	A study found that the kidnapped children suffered from panic attacks, nightmares involving kidnappings and death, and personality changes. Many developed fears of such things as "cars, the dark, the wind, the kitchen, mice, dogs and hippies,"[18] and one shot a Japanese tourist with a BB gun when the tourist's car broke down in front of his home.[19] Many of the children continued to report symptoms of trauma at least 25 years after the kidnapping, including substance abuse and depression, and a number have been imprisoned for "doing something controlling to somebody else."[20][21]


wiki article written by psycopath?


http://www.fresnobee.com/news/local/article32716614.html

kidnappers say was for money

https://www.mercurynews.com/2011/02/23/influential-backing-for-parole-of-chowchilla-bus-kidnappers/
	Influential backing for parole of Chowchilla bus kidnappers

	...Parole officials have never found James Schoenfeld or Frederick Woods, both 59, suitable for release. But in an unusual development, their families and attorneys have obtained statements over the years from the original prosecutor, the trial judge and two key police investigators, all supporting parole.

	“This was a very serious, bad crime,” said Gary Dubcoff, a San Francisco attorney who represents Woods. “But we’re saying that you either believe in rehabilitation or you don’t.”

	The men have spent more than half their lives in prison after the kidnapping in their early 20s. The kidnappers, who were sons of wealthy families in Atherton and Woodside, have said they hoped to collect a $5 million ransom after they ran into financial trouble while attempting to restore the Rengstorff House in Mountain View.


kidnappers were sons of wealthy CA families, but say needed more money

some influential people backed their parole in 2011


------


https://www.sfgate.com/crime/article/Why-the-state-parole-board-voted-to-release-6176008.php
	Why parole board voted to release Chowchilla kidnapper

	By Bob Egelko

	The crime was horrific, even by today’s standards, and remains a nightmare nearly 39 years later for its victims — 26 schoolchildren and their bus driver, kidnapped at gunpoint in the Madera County town of Chowchilla, driven 100 miles north to Livermore, stashed in an underground quarry and held for the purpose of extracting a $5 million ransom.

	But the law can be forgiving with the passage of time, even in a state with laws as punitive as California’s, and the evidence of that was manifest Wednesday when a panel of the state Board of Parole Hearings found the second of the three kidnappers, James Schoenfeld, 63, eligible for release from prison.

	Schoenfeld’s younger brother, Richard, was paroled in 2012. The third kidnapper, Fred Woods, has his next parole hearing scheduled this fall.

	...“Of course in a case like this there’s anger, a desire for ongoing punishment,” Handleman said Thursday. “James does not dispute that it’s a heinous crime. But people change. That’s the fundamental principle that having a parole law recognizes.”

	Traumatic memory

	One of the victims, Jennifer Brown Hyde, who was 9 when she and her 10-year-old brother were abducted, told the Fresno Bee that she’s not ready to forgive the kidnappers.

	“They stole my childhood and caused me immense emotional pain over the years,” said Brown Hyde, now a 48-year-old Tennessee resident, who told the newspaper she still has anxiety attacks in confined spaces. She said the board’s decision left her with “a feeling of injustice because we were told they would never get out.”

	It should be considered a continuing crime, Madera County District Attorney David Linn said Thursday.

	“My reason for objecting (to parole) is that there are still victims of that crime who are still suffering,” he said in an interview. “Once he’s out, that’ll make things worse for the victims.”



Handleman says "of course there's desire for ongoing punishment" motivated by anger, attorney Linn counters that it's a "continuing crime" and "victims are still suffering"

kindof sounds like psycopath viewpoint, that justice motivated by resentement

Linn argument doesn't make much sense, I guess paints victims in same light as wiki article as sensitive whiners

	
	...The Schoenfelds of Atherton and Woods, who lived in Portola Valley, commandeered the bus full of summer school students on a Chowchilla road in July 1976. The men, all in their early 20s and with no serious criminal records, told relatives they needed money to pay off a $30,000 home loan.

	They put bus driver Ed Ray and the children in vans, drove them to Livermore and forced them into a moving van they had buried in a quarry. They wrote a note seeking a $5 million ransom, but they took a nap and when they woke heard on the radio that their victims had dug their way out after 16 hours, led by Ray and two older boys.


comandeered schoolbus, put driver and children in vans, then put in van they had burried in a quarry. Wrote a note for $5 million ransom, took a nap, woke up and found they had escaped.


	...Richard Schoenfeld turned himself in eight days later, and the others were captured the following week. They were initially sentenced to life without the possibility of parole, but a state appeals court ruled in 1980 that all three were eligible for future release because none of the victims had been seriously injured — some scrapes and nosebleeds, and emotional trauma, but no substantial physical harm that would have mandated a no-parole sentence.

	...The state Supreme Court ruled in a separate case in 2008 that the parole board, which considers cases of murderers, kidnappers and others sentenced to life with the possibility of parole, could not rely on the seriousness of the original crime to deny release, but must instead find evidence that an inmate would be dangerous to the public if released today. 


??


	...“He’s 63 years old. He’s not going to go out and hijack another bus or commit another crime,” Handleman said. He said Schoenfeld, questioned at length by parole board members, repeatedly expressed remorse and promised to live “a life dedicated to making amends, with what he has left of his life, by living a law-abiding life.”


------

NY Times article when children found:

https://www.nytimes.com/1976/07/17/archives/26-children-found-safe-after-being-kidnapped-from-bus-in-california.html?_r=0
	A spokesman for the sheriff's department there said that the bus driver, 55‐year‐old Frank Edward Ray, said the abductors were white men.

	One of them, said to be about 6 feet tall, wielded a chrome‐handled pistol and a sawed‐off shotgun during the abduction, the spokesman said.


Ray identified kidnappers, one with pistol and shotgun


	...A spokesman for the Livermore fire department said he had been told that two of the children had managed to dig out from under boards and gravel that had been used to hide the kidnap victims.

	He said he had also been told that the two had made their way through the Cal Rock Quarry until they found a night watchman who helped uncover the others.


NY Times reported spokesman saying van was buried under gravel and it was two children who dug out and got help


	...After the children were freed, the authorities attemped to stake out the site, on the possibility that the abductors would return. But the surveillance was thwarted by a crush of curiosity seekers drawn to the quarry by news of the recovery.

	“The bus made three stops after school—he never made the fourth stop,” said Lee Roy Tatom, superintendent of the Dairyland Union School District.

	As of late today, 24 hours after the disappearance, the authorities said they had received no communications demanding ransom for the children or providing any clue to the disappearance.


weren't able to stake out crime scene because of press coverage. Didn't get a ransom note as of 24 hours after disappearance


	...The authorities said they were not now working on the theory that he was a party to the disappearances.

	Mr. Ray's wife and another relative of his work at the local Bank of America, one of Chowchilla's two banks. For this reason, the police had the bank under surveillance. But they said there had been no communications to the bank seeking money in connection with the disappearance.

	Madera County Sheriff Ed Bates said his detectives had been alerted by an Orange, N.J., woman about a 1958 novel by Hugh Pentecost, “The Day the Children Vanished,” about a busload of children abducted as a ruse to lure the residents of a town called Clayton away from their homes and businesses so that a gang can rob a local bank.

	“We don't know if there's any connection, but we're looking at the book,” he said.


weird

why did tipster and NY times mention this?


	...“They're just common, everyday people,” Mr. Tatom, the superintendent, said. “They're the kind of people who don't wear ties, you know. They're the kind who wear blue jeans and a clean shirt and are good, hard‐working people. I don't think it is money they wear after. I just think it has something to do with a life for a life, but that's only a theory.”

	“I have my suspicions,” said Judy Hinesley, whose 7‐year‐old daughter, Sherry, is misssing. “It's a group of people who either wanted money, or publicity, or both, and they'll get it—look at all the reporters that are here. They're going to get the attention they want.”


kidnapees weren't wealthy, some wonder on motive


	...Parents Are Puzzled

	Mrs. Hinesley and her husband, a heavy‐equipment operator, stayed up last night at the sheriff's department substation here, the hub of the search effort, along with other parents.

	Chowchilla is one of scores of similar communities in the heart of the great Central Valley, one of the richest agricultural belts in the world. It is 256 miles northwest of Los Angeles and 150 miles southeast of San Francisco, and makes its living from cotton, corn, dairy products and other agricultural products.

	The authorities put together the following account of what they believe happened yesterday:

	About 175 pupils, from kindergarten through eighth grade, were picked up for school shortly before the summer session began at 8:45 A.M. After a morning of academic‐oriented classes—arithmetic, history and so forth—the pupils, as usual, (spent the afternoon in a variety of recreational pursuits, including a swimming outing for some.

	School ended at 3:45 P.M., and the bus driven by Mr. Ray left the Dairyland school, which is in a sparsely settled farming area 12 miles west of here.

	The bus made three stops to drop off children and continued on. About 4:15 P.M., for unknown reasons, it went off its normal route. Instead of turning right at an intersection leading to the fourth stop, it apparently continued west toward what is called the Berenda Slough.

	It was in the slough that the bus was found, at about 7 P.M., after parents began calling the school inquiring about their children.

	“It's a complete mystery,” Mr. Tatom said. “After the third stop, it appears the driver was stopped and he lost command of the bus.”

	“This thing had to be well organized. Whoever did it knew the route. He knew the timing, and lie knew the area very well. A lot of people wouldn't have known about that slough. It was well thought out, and the bus had to be maneuvered into that slough by someone who knew what he was doing.”

	Sheriff Bates said. “I guess I'm a fundamentalist on this, but I can't help but think anybody who would do this, who would take boys and girls and kidnap them, whatever their motive, can't help but be psychotic. Whether it is political, whether it is self‐serving, whether it is personal, I can't help but think it's psychotic.”


Bus started full (how many?), made three stops and let off children. Before fourth stop, went off normal route, took a different turn, later found in bushes in slough.

Appears driver was stopped and lost command of the bus after the third stop.

Would have to be well organized--kidnappers would have to know route, timing, and area very well.

Bus would have had to have been manuevered into slough by someone who knew what they were doing.

Sheriff suspected psychotic motive.


------


on Cowchila, CA:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chowchilla,_California#History
	The name "Chowchilla" is derived from the indigenous American tribe of Chaushila (the spelling is inconsistent in reference guides), a Yokut Indian tribe which once lived in the area. The name evidently translates as "murderers" and is apparently a reference to the warlike nature of the Chaushila tribe. It is also to be known among the Yokuts tribes later on to be associated with "bravery". The Chaushila Indians were inadvertently responsible for the first white men "discovering" Yosemite Valley, which occurred when they were being pursued by a band of whites. References to the tribe still abound in Chowchilla, and until 2016 the town's high school used the moniker "Redskins" as their mascot.


name means "murderers", taken from tribe of native Americans who used to live there

in central valley close to Madera

pop 4-5,000 at time of Kidnapping



------



NY Times profile on Fred Woods:

https://www.nytimes.com/1976/07/23/archives/quarry-owners-son-called-a-loner-fond-of-old-cars.html
	SAN FRANCISCO, July 22—Fred Newhall Woods, who is being sought for questioning in the investigation of the kidnapping of 26 schoolchildren and their bus driver in Chowchilla, is the scion of a prominent California family and has been described by acquaintances as a loner with a fascination for old cars, which he collected on a vast estate his family has owned for generations.

	Mr. Woods is a 1970 graduate of Woodside High School, 40 miles south of here. He is the son of Fred Nickerson Woods 3d, who owns the California Rock and Gravel Company, based here, and the quarry in Livermore where the schoolchildren and their driver, Franklin Edward Ray, dug themselves out of a buried moving van trailer last Friday after being entombed for 16 hours.

	The younger Mr. Woods, who is 25 years old, has been identified as the person who bought the trailer last November.


Woods scion of wealthy family, 25 years old, loner who collected cars on vast family estate

father owned quarry in Livermore where children and driver were found

bought the trailer where buried 8 months earlier


	Relative Is ‘Shocked

	Officials in the Alameda County Sheriff's Department also seek to question two friends of his, James L. Schoenfeld, 25, and his brother, Richard A. Schoenfeld, 22, the sons of an Atherton podiatrist, John Schoenfeld.

	Scott Newhall, a first cousin once removed of the younger Mr. Woods, said he was not surprised to hear that Mr. Woods had purchased the trailer, because of his penchant for collecting old vehicles. But he said he was “as shocked as anyone else that Fred is a suspect.”

	“The motivation bugs me,” said Mr. Newhall, former executive editor of The San Francisco Chronicle.

	Mr. Newhall, 62, now edits The Newhall Signal, a triweekly newspaper in a town 300 miles south of here named for his great‐grandfather, Henry M. Newhall, a Massachusetts businessman who his fortune here in the 19th century.


Schoenfeld brothers were Woods friends, sons of Atherton podiatrist.

Woods cousin Newhall was executive editor of SF Chronicle, then editor of Newhall signal

Newhall said not surprising bought the trailer since he collects cars, shocked that Woods a suspect, "motivation bugs me"

article goes on about Newhall family building railroads, grandmother one of "great ladies" on SF society, parents prosperous but not "active in society life"


friend says Woods recently got married but marriage didn't last long


	...Worked at Quarry

	After graduating from high school, where he apparently was an average student, Mr. Woods took a job in the family business and worked at the quarry for a year and a half, loading and weighing trucks, according to workers there. The workers also said that he sometimes drove to work in an old taxicab that had 300,000 miles on the odometer.

	Mr. Woods used part of his grandmother Frances's 200acre “Hawthorne Estate” at 800 Los Trancos Street in Portola Valley to collect old cars and other things, including a train caboose, as his father, a 1938 graduate of Stanford University, had done.


Woods worked at the quarry after high school, loading and weighing trucks

collected man cars on grandmother's estate in Portola Valley


	...Mr. Woods acquired a number of these vehicles apparently in a car restoration building he had set up with the Schoenfelds.

	Although several persons described Mr. Woods as “aloof,” a young man who said he was well‐acquainted with him described him and the Schoenfelds as “very straight, nice friendly guys—I can't imagine either one of them being involved in something like this.”


Woods and Schoenfelds seemed like nice and friendly guys



------


Portola Valley is near SF, 139 miles away from Cowchilla, and the Quarry also in bay area was 100 miles away. Unusual they picked Cowchilla and knew bus route and timing given how far away it was.

It was ascertained by others contemporary to the event that the kidnappers would have had to have known the area very well.



------


contemporary news coverage:


AP July 16 1976:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/315175/?terms=Cowchilla
	Mass kidnaping feared by sheriff

	...Deputies and police scoured the farmlands around Chowchilla, search planes were out at dawn, volunteers joined on horseback and the FBi was called in. Parents gathered at the police station, life ceased its normal routine along the two blocks of the main street, and still, nearly 24 hours after the disappearance of the children and the driver, ther was no real clue as to why or how or where they might be.

	"It appears to be an abduction," Sheriff Ed Bates said. "We'll search the whole state if we have to. And if we have to, we'll search the entire United States."


kindof like that book?

but in general they got everyone searching and kidnappers would know they'd have a tough time finding them that way


issued statewide bulletin for up to three vans beleived travelling west

found two cotton swabs, cauze and a plastic cup 75 yards from abaondoned school bus, Sheriff Bates said "not satisfied" significant, "It could have been a case of littering by our people taking photographs."

found two sets of tracks on bus tracks, Bates said showed "somebody left the area after the bus was parked."

didn't find any blood or evidence of foul play on scene


parents started calling authorites late that afternoon


	...The sheriff's office said it received calls from anxious parents beginning about 4:15 p.m. Thursday. At that time, the bus was two hours overdue.

	...Parents, expecting their children home for supper after a day of swimming and playing, started calling authorities late yesterday afternoon. As the evening wore on, they gathered in the police station lounge, sipping coffee as they waited for some word about their sons and daughters.

	Some joined this morning in the widespread search for the children in autos and on horseback.


Sheriff said parents started calling in 2 hours after bus overdue

some gathered in police station, others went on search, others waited all night

	
	...The Diarlyand Unified School district bus was found 4 miles south of Chowchilla, a San Joaquin Valley farm community of 4,500 with a mainstreet barely two blocks long. Fields of dense corn and other crops and occasional orchards of fruit and nut trees stretch in all directions around the tiny town.

	There are 150 to 155 students in summer school at the Dairyland, about 8 miles south of Chowchilla.

	Principal Lee Roy Tatom said today was to have been the last day of the session.


article by Joe Bigham: https://www.newspapers.com/image/316525588/?terms=Chowchilla


Miam News 16 Jul

https://www.newspapers.com/image/302481496/?terms=Chowchilla
	The FBI today joined an intensive investigation for 26 children and their schoolbus driver who were apparently victims of a mass kidnaping.

	President Ford asked the FBI for a written report, and wants to be kept personally informed.

	...Reports of armed men following schoolbuses were made to the Madera County Sheriff's Department a year ago, and now were being checked out.


President Ford and FBI were interested in case

Madera county had gotten tips of armed men following schoolbuses a year earlier



UPI article on same 16 Jul:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/2387706/?terms=Chowchilla

some initially thought radical group or terrorists

dust patterns led investigators to believe bus was empty at time it was abandoned


	...In brush about 75 yards from the bus, searchers found cotton swabs and guaze in a plastic bottle. It appeard someone had been sitting near where the bottle was found, Deputy Sheriff James Christopher said.


a little different from AP article (why?)

	
	...Tracks from perhaps two vehicles besides the bus were found at the scene, but a heavy rain during the night hampered the investigation. Authorities said the area often is used by hunters, which might explain the tire tracks.


AP different, doesn't mention dust thing, talks about signs of vioence at scene in context of gauze and "plastic cup" found there, says tire tracks might be from criminals leaving scene


	...Although the evidence pointed to the likelihood of a kidnapping, authorities were baffled because there had been no ransom notes or phone calls.

	The FBI sent six agents to the scene from its Sacramento office, but Paul C. Young, special agent in charge, said there was no legal basis to declare the disappearance and kidnapping and that the agents were only offering assistance and were not officially assigned to the case.


Why FBI jump on it in this way? maybe important, another article said FBI was there to "determine if this was a federal crime kidnapping"


LA Times:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/383016033/?terms=Chowchilla

3 children dropped off before bus was reported missing


same author Frank Del Olmo page 2:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/383016047
	Investigators found it had been parked behind the bamboo so that it was screened from a little used road. Dust on the seats and the lack of many footprints on the ground convinced Madera County Sheriff Ed Bates that the children had been taken off the bus elsewhere.


a little weird compared to AP article if Bates was convinced of this


	...But the FBI, which generally enters only those kdinaping cases in which there is evidence or presumption that a state line has been crossed, began flying agents in from Sacramento and Los Angles this morning.


FBI involvement also maybe unusual

also says Ford "quite concerned"--worth checking if had anything to do with politics and Ford? e.g. "we will tell you where they are if you do X but otherwise all the children will die"

was some watergate stuff concurrent to this

were this the case, psycopaths would approve of this and emphasize danger the children were in since they would feel they could blame Ford if something happened to them

probably would be hard to find things pointing to this in press though


	...There was even the theory--Thursday being the next to last day of summer school--that it was some prank that had been carried too far.

	But Bates, who has been in Naval Intelligence and several law enforcement agents before taking over in Madera County, said:

	"The Thing that really broke me up, thinking about it," he said, "was those kids out there with that thunder and lightning."

	...James Esterbrook, 28, a factor press operator whose 8-year-old son, John, was on the bus, tried desperately to make some sense of the mystery.

	"This is just a small town," he said. "There is no reason for vengeance . . . We have no power in this community or anything like that. I don't know what they want from me."


how did subject of vengeance come up in interview? weird since most wouldn't think vengeance would be dealt against children

maybe related to the bit in wiki article about native American tribe there before...?

dunno but generally psycopaths convince themselves that their victims deserve it, so this is important


	As the mystery deepened throughout an eerie night of rain, lightning and thunder, parents called or came to the Chowchilla police station just off the two-block-long main street.

	"There must be a logcial explanation," murmured Sam Barletta, father of 12-year-old Lista, one of the missing children. "It seems so damn strange. I haven't faced reality yet."

	...The parents apparently shared the feeling that whoever was responsible for the disappeareance of their children, it was not the bus driver, Frank Edward Ray Jr., 55.

	"Many people my age can remember when he drove them to school," said Bill Parker.

	Ray was described by local resident Bonnie Perez as "very sweet and responsible. He's the sweetest of all the bus drivers. He'd do anything for those kids and they'd do anything for him."

	...Sheriff Bates lost no time asking the state attorney general's office to go to its computer system for a print-out of possible suspects in a crime against a school bus full of children.

	Authorities knew in advance what one profile would be: that of the so-called Zodiac who terrorized the San Francisco Bay area during 1968, 1969, and 1970 by bragging of killing 17 people.

	Police have definitely linked him to six murders.

	On Oct. 17, 1969, the San Francisco Chronicle got a letter from the Zodiac in which he threatened to kill a busload of children.

	"Schoolchildren make nice targets," he wrote. "I think I shall wipe out a school bus some morning. Just shoot out the front tire and then pick off the kiddies as they come bouncing out."

	Buses were placed under guard for a time in various Bay Area counties.

	The Zodiac was never caugh and has not been heard from since 1971.

	A 1971 Clint Eastwood firm, "Dirty-Harry," obviously based on the Zodiac case, had the psycopathic killer hijacking a bus filled with children.


Frank Del Olmo article has some anomalies, maybe he is a psycopath

unusual that he uses a lot of the article to emphasize the terror and confusion of the children's parents and the populace, also weird turns of phrase and things he chooses to mention

like ending article "by the way it could be Zodiac Killer isn't it scary???"



...


17 Jul 1976

https://www.newspapers.com/image/246164790/?terms=Chowchilla
	Children Found, Suspects Sought

	CHOWCHILLA, Calif. (AP)-- Twenty-six children and their school bus driver returned home early today, weary but unhurt, ending a bizarre but still unexplained 36-hour mass kidnaping odyssey.

	There was no certain word of a motive, but an all-points bulletin was issued for thee unidentified men who abducted the 27 at gunpoint near Chowchilla Thursday afternoon.

	...THe 26 children and a bus driver Frank Edward Ray Jr. escaped Friday night from a partially buried truck body, nearly 100 miles north of here, where the three men imprisoned them about 4 a.m. Friday.

	Ray, his crewcut still laced with dirt and grime, told reports today that the children screamed and shouted "Why? Why?" as the masked men shut them in the truck and started piling dirt on top of it.

	There was no answer.

	Ray said it was dark in the truck, but the men had left him a flashlight. A small hole in the roof of the truck appeared to be the only escape. The abductors had covered the whole with steel and wood and weighted it down with a large battery.

	Ray said he and two of the boys piled up matresses and used a piece of wood to clear the hole.

	"It was just lucky I found a block of wood 18 inches long and I used it as a pry," Ray said.

	The bus driver said Robert Gonzales, 11, was the first ouf of the truck, and Michael Marshall, 14, helped Ray pass the other children out of the truck body.

	Ray said that when all were free, they walked about 200 yards to a gravel quarry, where they found a maintenance man who called the Alameda County sheriff's office.

	Ray said the three masked men rarely spoke, asking only for names and ages and telling their captives to hand over some of their clothing. Some were left only in their underwear.


36 hour manhunt, found after escape

Kidnappers left Ray a flashlight, and hole covered with steel, wood, and large batter was only escape

Ray and two boys piled up mattressess and used a piece of wood to clear the hole

kidnappers were masked, rarely spoke, and asked only for names and some pieces of clothing

after got out found maintanence man who called police


kindof weird

planned all that out, but left mattresses and peice of wood to pry them out in the van. Did they want them to escape?


	
	...Bill Auffarth, a registered nurse, accompanied the children, whose ages ranged from 6 to 14. He said they told him their captors treated them nicely, providing them with potato chips, soup, cereal and water.

	..."The locked us in a big pit and we had to dig our way out," Mike Marshall, 14, told reporters.

	The bus driver, who is 55, gave more details later. He said dirt began falling on the captives as they tried to dig out, and that was the most frightening point.

	Chowchilla Mayor Jim Dumas also said that captives "had problems with air. They poured water on each other to keep them from suffocating."



nurse says children told them captives treated them nicely and gave food and water

dug out of van as dirt fell in

mayor said captives had problems with suffocating

	
	...Dumas said that at about the time the children escaped, the Almeda County sheriff's office received a call from an unidentified woman who said "Livermore can become famous" if deputies went to the quarry because the missing children were there.

	The mayor also said that while he was away Friday evening, his wife received a call from an unidentified woman who said, "The kids have been found, but it's not over.... There will be others."

	There was no immediate comment from investigators about the call.


Sheriff got call saying "Livermore can become famous" if they went to quarry because children were there

Mayor got call saying there will be others


another article "Parents React" says no "nobody is going to trust anybody," but happy, John Brown's son Jeff might be able to draw sketch of kidnappers


17 Jul 1976 UPI article:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/15448155/?terms=Chowchilla
	'It's fun,' tot says

	FBI questions children


opens with FBI trying to get kid to answer questions, some children excited that press were there


	..."Okay, Monica," said the FBI agent, "would you come with me now?"

	"Don't worry," soothed one of the friends. "It's fun. They ask you a lot of questions and then they give you stuff."


guess "it's fun" referring to FBI questioning, not being kidnapped...


	The FBI interrogated the children throughout the early morning hours, trying to solve the puzzle of what happened and why. Through the windows of the long building, the small heads of children could be seen poking above huge desks in brightly-illuminated offices. "They gave us very good descriptions of the suspects," an agent said. "They were very attentive and very cooperative."

	Piles of sneakers and shorts and jeans packed tightly in fishnet bags covered the floor. The children ran obstacle courses through the laundry, laughing, screaming with pleasure. It was a celebration of life to help them forget the terrors of the long night before.


got description of suspects from children (what about bus driver?)


main UPI article on it:


	Kidnapers sought

	26 abducted children safe; found in quarry

	The 26 children abducted with their school bus driver at gun point were safe at home with their families today. The heroci driver told a press conference about the bizarre events leading up to the kidnaping and the 26-hour ordea in an underground cavern.

	Driver Frank 3. Ray, 55, said that he and some of the older boys among the schoolchildren never stopped digging until they were out of the underground prison at a rock quarry a few miles east of LIvermore.

	"We thought were were going to die," Ray said. "The kids did a lot of crying and begging for their mommas. We thought they were going to suffocate us."

	The strain of 50 sleepless hours showing on his florid, drawn face, the Madera County School District driver explained how he and the elementary school children were abducted by three white gunmen.

	As Ray drove the children home from a swimming outing Thursday a white van blocked the small rural road.

	"I slowed to pass it and a man stepped out with two guns, then two other men stepped out," Ray said. "There were two vans. They ordered me to get into one of them."

	The children were divided into groups, placed in the vans with covered windows and one of the abductors drove the bus to a secluded drainage ditch where it was hidden.


Ray didn't sleep for 50 hours

was driving when a van blocked bus, tried to pas then man with two guns stelled out, then two others. There were two vans and Ray ordered into one. Children divided into groups and placed in the vans. Then one of abductors drove bus to the ditch where it was hidden.


	"We drove around a lot. Then they backed up the vans and unloaded us. They asked for our names and ages," said Ray.

	The vans actually traveleld 100 miles in 11 hours to the working quarry in livermore, about 40 miles east of San Francisco. At about 3:30 a.m. Friday Ray was forced to strip to his shorts and shirt and descend a ladder into a deep hole.

	"There were Cheerios and potato chips and bread and plenty of water down there," he said. There were also several matresses.


then piled weight on the whole while they begged them to stop

then says Ray and some boys piled matresses and dug out, Ray roamed gravel pit until he found a maintenance man


also UPI article "Bus driver proves hero" saying Ray well liked, community certain never involved, did most of digging and "splashed water on his face" while digging



LA Times 17 Jul 1976 article:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/383017544/
	Abductors Escape as FBI, Police Storm Rock Quarry

	BY JERRY COHEN and FRANK DEL OLMO

	CHOWCHILLA--Twenty-six kidnapped children and their bus driver were rescued Friday night at a rock qarry near Livermore as their two abductors were digging a trench presumably in preparation for killing and burying them.

	Lt. Gov. Mervyn Dymally announced the development at a news conference here.

	The persons who abducted the 19 girls, deven boys and the bus driver here Thursday afternoon reportedly escaped as FBI agents and Alameda County deputy sheriffs stormed the quarry.

	They were being sought in the LIvermore area.

	Two vans used to transport the victims from Chowchilla to the quarry 95 miles away were found at the quarry.

	One report said several of the youngsters were already in the ditch and apparently were about to be killed and buried when FBI agents and deputies arrived at the California Rock Co. quarry on Stalney Road west of Livermore.


different from AP and UPI, this says two abdoctors digging trench while FBI and police rescued them

this was announced in press conference in LA? or in Chowchilla probably

"one report" says FBI arrived right as children already in ditch were apparently about to be killed (?)

Dymally said someone who lived near quarry noticed something suspicious and phoned police


why completely different story on how they were rescued?

	
	...Carol Marshall, mother of the oldest kidnaped youngster, Micael, 14, blurted out:

	"I couldn't believe it. It was just the same as when they were taken. I couldn't believe that either."

	Mrs. Marshall said the abductors should get the "absolute maximum" penalty, "whatever is available."

	...One of the parents said earlier that the abductors "should be hung from the nearest tree" when found.

	Janice Park, mother of the two of the kidnaped children, said she also hoped the abductors would get thd eath penalty.

	"I don't want to see this happen to anyone else," Mrs. Park said. 

	...Up until the announcement, the parents of the hcildren had sat by their telephones, as summer thunder rumbled ominously, waiting for some word as to the fate of their children.

	But except for the cracking of the lightning there was only slience. The phones never rang. There were no demands for ransom, no instructions from terrorists.

	At a prayer meeting in the little white stucco First Baptist Church in the center of town, an old man stood up and, as the thunder clapped, cried out to God:

	"Lord, it looks like Thou has piced this little town of Chowchilla for an awakening that we may honor and worship You with more sincerity, and that we may get back on the right path with Thee."


also reports that a man in a fedora was seen giving money to children (?), found some clothes on highway and 1.5 miles from bus


	...In Washington, President Ford received a page-and-a-half report on the case from the FBI. The President instructed Atty. Gen. Edward H. Levi to use all available FBI and government agency resources to find the children and the driver.

	...In one of several press conferences during the long, rainy night, Bates said he believed there had been an "abduction"--but he refrained from using the term "kidnaping" because there had been no ransom demand.

	But the FBI, which generally enters only those kidnaping cases in which there is evidence of presumption that a state line had been crossed, began flying agents in from Sacramento and Los Angeles this morning.


wonder what would have happened if FBI didn't get involved? would press have stressed there was no ransom?


rest of article is copy of old one, ends with Zodiac killer thing


Jerry Cohen article on pg 21 unusual, weird dropping references to religion, emphasizing fear and wondering motive, vengeance, and the native American tribe that was there before: https://www.newspapers.com/image/383017685/


another AP article:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/57087138/
	By then, some of the children had dug their way through the cavern opening, Houchins said.

	(The New York Times quoted a spokesman for the Livermore Fire Department as saying he had been told that two of the children had managed to dig out from under board and gravel that had been used to hide the kidnap victims. He said he had also been told that the two had made their way through the Cal Rock Quarry until the y found a nigh watchman who helped uncover the others.)


Other reports say it was Ray who did most of digging, "wandered" around quary until found watchman


NY Times article on same day doesn't say Ray helped dig out or find watchman, also says:

https://www.nytimes.com/1976/07/17/archives/26-children-found-safe-after-being-kidnapped-from-bus-in-california.html?_r=0
	By ROBERT LINDSEY

	...The authorities said 19 girls and seven boys, 6 to 14 years had been on the bus when it was seized. Mr. Ray, the driver, has worked for the school district for 26 years. The authorities said they were not now working on the theory that he was a party to the disappearances.

	Mr. Ray's wife and another relative of his work at the local Bank of America, one of Chowchilla's two banks. For this reason, the police had the bank under surveillance. But they said there had been no communications to the bank seeking money in connection with the disappearance.

	Madera County Sheriff Ed Bates said his detectives had been alerted by an Orange, N.J., woman about a 1958 novel by Hugh Pentecost, “The Day the Children Vanished,” about a busload of children abducted as a ruse to lure the residents of a town called Clayton away from their homes and businesses so that a gang can rob a local bank.

	“We don't know if there's any connection, but we're looking at the book,” he said.


so AP recounts Ray digging them out, UPI says Ray a hero, NY Times throws suspicion on him and LA Times says it was all cops and FBI descending on fleeing perps without mentioning Ray digging them out

maybe they were angry Ray the bus driver thwarted their plans


more AP reporting 17 Jul:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/57087140/
	Depuy DIck Jayne of the Alameda County sheriff's office said the children had been at the quarry since 3:30 a.m. Friday. Jayne said the bus driver had told authorities that the group was greeted at the quarry with "potato chips and refreshments."

	He declined to explain how the children were detained.

	He said the driver, Ed Ray, was being questioned by authorities, "although he is not a suspect at this time."

	He said deputies had received an anonymous tip that the children might be in the quarry, although he said neighbors across the street from the scene had noticed nothing unusual.


many articles giving different accounts

LA Times Olmo article says:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/383017544/	
	Dymally said a person who lives near the quarry noticed supsicious activity around the quarry and telephoned deputy sheriffs


opposed to this, says got anonymous tip, "though neighbors across the street" noticed nothing unusual

where both these articles after Dymally press conference?

	
	...Bates said earlier, "My reading is we have a mysterious disappearance. There's no indications of foul play, no indication of scuffling. Yet, the children are gone. Maybe they did it with persuasion. I don't know how you get 26 kids to do your bidding without a great deal of planning."



Chicago Tribune on Jul 17 reports it as neighbor called in suspicious activity in quarry:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/383773919/?terms=Chowchilla
	By Roland Koziol

	...Without going down into the quarry, police set up a surveillance perimitter around the area, suspecting corecctly that the suspicious activity was connected with the kidnaped children.

	However, after a short time, investigators said, police felt that the abductors had been tipped off to their strategy, possibly by monitoring the police radio, and they moved in on the vans. They found the children locked inside.

	ALTHOUGH NO ransom note or other demands were ever received from the kidnapers, investigators are toying with a theory that they might be connected with some terrorist group operating in the politically volatile Bay Area of San Francisco.

	It could, be, investigators speculate, that the kidnapers intended to exchange the children for some well-known prisoners, perhaps Patricia Hearst, William and Emily Harris, or others.

	In Chowchilla, Madera County Sheriff Ed Bates said the possibility of a terrorist-oriented kidnaping was baffling because "the central valley of California is relatively unsophisticated in gureila warfare."


article has no mention of kids digging themselves out

puts forth idea "maybe they were politically-motivated terrorists"


also has front page article on similarity to "Day the Children Vanished" novel

	...The DETECTIVE story's kidnaping motive is not ransom, but is a ruse to lure the people of Clayton, a small mining town, away from their homes and businesses while a gang robs the local bank.

	...Mahoney also is the father of the book's bus driver who, like the man in the Chowchilla case, was known as a model of reliability.


AP also had article on similarities, said police were reading it: https://www.newspapers.com/image/34137100/



...


18 Jul 1976

https://www.newspapers.com/image/98252946/
	Bus Driver Tells of Kidnap, Terror, Escape

	BY ALTON SLAGLE

	New York News

	CHOWCHILLA, Calif. -- He thought at one point that they must be trying to kill them, the 27 of them crammed together in a hot airless, half-buried truck trailer. They could hear the hated men above them slowly, deliberately cut the metal mesh and canvas that formed a roof and held back the heavy soil and rock piled atop it.

	The dirt and the rocks began cascading down on the crying, scared-to-death youngsters and Ed Ray.

	Then it stopped. The sound of shoes above them ceased. They waited for what seemed like an eternity in the dark steaming trailer.


Ray says perps cut a hole in the van and let dirt in, then left

why would they do that?

	
	...This is his story:

	"I left Dairyland School about 10 minutes to 4 with my busload of kids. I left off two stops, left off another stop and then came back on Avenue 21. There was a white van parked down the road with the door open and I slowed up because he was over the white line.

	"I slowed up to go around him and out jumped a man with two guns and a mask on. He ordered me to open my door, the other two guys jumped out of the van, on of 'em ordered me to the back seat and the other one took over my bus. He continued on down the road for about a mile, then he turned into the slough (dry creek) bottom, into the tules (reeds) with my bus with all the kids on it.

	"The white van pulled up by my door, backed up and ordered about half the kids in. Then they pulled the black one up and loaded the rest of 'em. I was on the back van. It was just solid black in there.

	"We got stuck, I thought he wasn't gonna' get out but he got out and he traveled and traveled and traveled to get to where we were.

	"We got to this one spot, he runs through some brush and stuff, I hear it scratching the van. He left the cooler on for a while, and they he shut it off. We hought we was gonna' suffocate in there for a while. I pulled the carpet loose to try to get air

	"THEN ABOUT 3:30 in the morning, he backed the van up to this thing that was all canvassed over. He unloaded us through the back door. He wanted the bus driver first, so I got out and he asked me my name and my age. Then he wanted my pants and my boots so I had to give him that.

	"Then he unloaded all the kids and asked for a name and age. He gave me a flashlight and I had to help the kids down through this about a three-fot hole down into this old building, old truck body I guess it was. When they got through, they pulled the ladder up and put a big steel plate over the hole, so there we was down there.

	"They had some food and some water for us, some Cheerios and 'tater chips, plent of water and a couple of loaves of bread.

	"They had this building (the truck trailer) all lined with big ol' mesh wire. THey stood on the outside and we cuould hear them cutting the wires and the ceiling started to cave in. We thought we were gonna' have it right then. We kept beggin' them to let us out.

	"In the afternoon we never did hear 'em cutting the wires no more, so me and a couple of the boys decided we'd better start diggin. When we started to move this steel plate, we couldn't hardly move it because it had two great big ol' batteries on top of it. One of the batteries I couldn't even lift myself. I had to get the kids to help me. We had to pile up mattresses and stuff to get as close enough to the whole to get out.

	"They had another big box filled about 30 inches high. They had dirt piled on each side and the top and we couldn't start to move it. It's just lucky we had a short block of wood in a thing there they had for a brace, and we used it to pry.

	"We'd throw water over our heads to try to cool off and go up and dig some more. I'd say it was about 7 o'clock we got dug out. I handed the kids up to the other boys and we got out. Just lucky enough there was a gravel pit there within 200 feet of us and there was a man over there so we told him what happened. He want and called the sheriff, and the seriffs and the fire trucks and everything else came and we had a big crowd and we all got home safe."

	...The abductors had cut small hoes in the metal sides of the 8- by 16-foot prison so that the children could have a toilet of sorts. But the air inside was stifling, and, Ray said, it became increasingly difficult to breathe.

	He said the kidnappers said nothing to him except to ask his name and, "I never did as much as hear 'em speak to one another."

	But the frightened children made up for it, "and I just talked to 'em and begged 'em not to holler and screme that we're gonna' try to get out of here."

	...When they started cutting the wire mesh, and the dirt started caving in, Ray became fearful that the men meant to kill their prisoners. "That's the only thing I thought about," he said.



bus driver Ray account:

Slowed down from white van with door open on the road.

man with two guns and a mask jumped out and ordered Ray to open the door.

Then two other guys jumped out of the van, one ordered him to back seat and the other started driving the bus. They drove to the slough with all the kids in the bus.

The white van pulled up by the door and ordered half the kids in. Then the black van pulled up for the other half and Ray.

The van was solid black inside. They got stuck for awhile, then traveled a long time to the quarry.

At one point the van was in a spot with foliage that Ray could hear scraping the side of the van. The driver shut of the cooler and they thought they were going to suffocate. Ray pulled apart the carpet to try to get some air.

Then at 3:30 AM, he backed the van up to a structure that was canvassed over. He unloaded Ray first, asked him his name and age, and took his boots and pants.

They entered down a three foot hole on a ladder. They gave Ray a flashlight, and he had to help each kid as they were unloaded, and the kidnappers asked each their name and age. Then they pulled up the ladder and put a steel plate over the hole.

Inside was some food and water, Cheerios, potato chips, and some loaves of bread.

The structure was lined with mesh wire. They stood outside and Ray and the kids could hear them cutting the wires and the ceiling started to cave in. Ray and the kids thought they were going to die and begged them to let them out.

In the afternoon they didn't hear them cutting the wires anymore, and Ray and two boys decided to start digging. It was hard to move the steel plate because it had two heavy batteries on top, and Ray couldn't move it without the kids help. They had to pile mattresses and other things to get close enough to get out. They also (I think?) moved a box filled with dirt with thing they found for a pry.

They threw water on their heads to cool off and kept digging, getting out about 7 o'clock. Ray handed the kids to the other boys and they all got out (sounds like saying all got out from context). They found a man at a gravel pit and told him what happened. He called the sheriff and the police and a huge crowd came and they all got home safe.



not sure when/where this was said, but was known to AP by 17th:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/246164790/?terms=Chowchilla
	Ray said he and two of the boys piled up matresses and used a piece of wood to clear the hole.

	"It was just lucky I found a block of wood 18 inches long and I used it as a pry," Ray said.


unusual that says this in same article:

	
	...Bill Auffarth, a registered nurse, accompanied the children, whose ages ranged from 6 to 14. He said they told him their captors treated them nicely, providing them with potato chips, soup, cereal and water.

	..."The locked us in a big pit and we had to dig our way out," Mike Marshall, 14, told reporters.

	The bus driver, who is 55, gave more details later. He said dirt began falling on the captives as they tried to dig out, and that was the most frightening point.


got impression kidnappers were handing out potato chips, different from first-hand account of incident

would figure ceiling caving in as they cut wires would be "most frightening point", as Ray said, but this isn't mentioned in the article.


UPI article had bit about cutting wires and cave in, calls Ray a hero:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/15448155/?terms=Chowchilla


LA Times article doesn't mention Ray efforts at all, says cops found them with some in ditch dug by perps maybe about to be killed, ads bit about creepy guy with fedora with feather in it giving money to children and ends with zodiac killer bit from before:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/15448155/?terms=Chowchilla


similar to Chicago tribune, says neighbor called in and no mention of Ray:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/383773919/?terms=Chowchilla



before this: some earlier reports emphasized that the children were probably taken from bus before being driven to slough, contradicting Ray's statement

NY Times and other articles pushed idea of copy-cat crime of book where criminals kidnap school bus of kids to distract to rob bank, then point out Ray's relative worked at a local bank and implicated him that way


guess so far what probably happened:

In 1920's Nathan Leopold invented idea of "haha you were searching for your kid but your kid's dead," psycopaths marveled at this

imitated in 2nd "crime of the century" with kidnapping of Lindbergh's kid

but these three wealthy nobles were going to top them all, the true crime of the century

they kidnapped a school bus full of kids, brought to quarry they rigged to have roof collapse after cutting some wires

they wanted to get away with it, so they made Ray take off his pants and boots to be buried with them

Meanwhile, de Olmo and others wrote articles raising fear of serial killers, pedophiles, and all sorts of things public stereotypically frets about. There's the Zodiac killer and a guy with feather in fedora giving money to children--"who can you trust?" as one headline put it

but plan hit a snag--Ray and the kids were able to force open door and dig out, what they put on wasn't heavy enough with Ray and kids making levers and fulcrum and all sorts of things to get out.

Ray gets out and contacts a man watching over site--now it's clear word is going to get out one way or another

So, multiple people call in to give tip to police, perhaps ahead of Ray--this way, can argue Ray not the one who tipped off police, and can still frame him (as NY Times attempted to do)


what would it have looked like if plan succeeded, if Ray and kids died in the trailer? Would have found bus driver in trailer without pants with food and water in there, could conclude bus driver kidnapped kids, brought them to his trailer, then roof collapsed and they all died there. Perps could have taken clothing from Ray and clothing they took from kids (according to another article) and planted it to make it look like motive was pedophilia, which would have also explained the lack of ransom demands.


I guess after Ray and kids got out started speculating different scenarios that would put people off from perps, like Chicago Tribune saying maybe was politically-motivated terrorists:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/383773919/?terms=Chowchilla
	ALTHOUGH NO ransom note or other demands were ever received from the kidnapers, investigators are toying with a theory that they might be connected with some terrorist group operating in the politically volatile Bay Area of San Francisco.

	It could, be, investigators speculate, that the kidnapers intended to exchange the children for some well-known prisoners, perhaps Patricia Hearst, William and Emily Harris, or others.

	In Chowchilla, Madera County Sheriff Ed Bates said the possibility of a terrorist-oriented kidnaping was baffling because "the central valley of California is relatively unsophisticated in gureila warfare."


The other speculation that maybe some kind of copy-cat bank robbery plan involving Ray would make him suspect. That and citing reports of anonymous tips or neighbors instead of Ray (articles are fuzzy on this and not in agreement) would tend to discredit any testimony by him that would lead to the perps. Either way, the early assertions that perps must have known area and bus route and were taken off bus before arriving in slough would tend to discredit Ray as a witness.



De Olmo on 16th:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/383016047
	MYSTERY DEEPENS ON MISSING CHILDREN

	27 Believed Taken Off Bus Before It Was Left in Brush

	...Investigators found it had been parked behind the bamboo so that it was screened from a little used road. Dust on the seats and the lack of many footprints on the ground convinced Madera County Sheriff Ed Bates that the children had been taken off the bus elsewhere.


AP on 17th:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/57087140/
	Sheriff's Deputy Dennis Ring, a pilot, flew over te area about 7:15 p.m. and spotted the Dairyland Unified School Distrt bus in the dense bamboo growth. He dipped his wing in a signal to the deputies on the ground. They found the bus.

	"The first officer there got the impression there was dust on all the seats except the driver's seat," Bates said. "He felt that had the children been inside the bus until it stopped, the dust would have been gone. This indicates the children were dropped off someplace else."


De Olmo put words in Sheriff Bates mouth to push toward theory that kids were taken off bus before it was left in bushes, contradicting Ray's testimony


De Olmo and Cohen 17th:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/383017678/
	26 CHILDREN SAVED FROM KIDNAPERS

	Abductors Escape as FBI, Police Storm Rock Quarry

	CHOWCHILLA--Twenty-six kidnaped children and their bus driver were rescued Friday night at a rock quarry near Livermore as their two abductors were digging a trench presumably in preparation for killing and burying them.

	...One report said several of the youngsters were already in the ditch and apparently were about to be killed and buried when FBI agents and deputied arrived at the California Rock C. quarry

	...The suddent announcement of the rescue just in the nick of time came as a joyous shock to the community.

	...After a fruitless ground search, the bus was spotted from the air.

	Investigators found it had been parked behind the bamboo so that it was screened from a little used road. Dust on the seats and the lack of many footprints on the ground convinced Madera County Sheriff Ed Bates that the children had been taken off the bus elsewhere.


De Olmo reports that FBI and police swooped in and rescured them in the nick of time as 2 abductors fled, contradicting almost every other report.

Couldn't find anything else saying police stormed in and rescued "nick of time". Would also look bad for Ray if police swooped in and found him instead of him trying to rescue; both this and De Olmo's previous report would discredit Ray if they were true.

Ray said press swarmed the quarry after police were called, and some of his account made it to press on same day. Why didn't testimony of eywitnesses make it to De Olmo and Cohen's report?


Jul 17 AP:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/34137100/
	"The (the kidnappers) asked each of the children their names, ages and their parents' names. I conclude from that, and maybe you can conclude, that they were taken for ransom," Mayor Jim Dumas told a news conference after the children were home.

	"The walls of the excavation (where the children were imprisoned) collapsed somewhat and they became a little frightened, Dumas added."


the perps cut the roof loose and the kids screamed and begged them to stop

Why does Mayor Dumas make it sound like it was an accident?



------


https://www.ebay.com/itm/1976-Press-Photo-Palo-Alto-Transfer-Truck-Used-to-Hold-Kidnapped-Kids-Madera-CA-/401495600159

trailer used to entomb kids


how did it end up roof cave in from cutting wires?


has picture of inside: https://www.cnn.com/2015/11/19/us/rewind-chowchilla-school-bus-kidnapping/index.html


------


https://books.google.com/books?id=YWUxDKN80BgC&pg=PA336
    Russian fascism's main home was outside Europe, in Manchuria. The Russian Fascist Party, modelled on Mussolini's movement, was founded in the city of Harbin in 1931. Here, on the remote reaches of the Sungary river, thousands of Russians who had fled from the revolution constructed a little Russia. In a city teeming with different nationalities, the Russians printed and read numerous papers in Russian, attended the Russian cathedral, sat in cafes along the smart Bolshoi Prospekt, and talked endlessly of the war of revenge against Bolshevism. The White community was fractions and diverse, and Soviet agents encouraged their squabbles.


something like this going on in Chowchilla?


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1986-07-20/features/8602220197_1_school-bus-bus-driver-chowchilla
	A Decade-old Crime Holds A Small Town Hostage
	July 20, 1986
	By Linda Witt

	CHOWCHILLA, CALIF. — Edward Ray, 65, has a 26-foot Winnebago sitting out back of his house by the old dairy barn and a new $125 gold watch the Dairyland School gave him in June when he officially retired after 33 years as a school bus driver. When summer school is over this week (he still is driving the bus this summer), he and his wife, Odessa, may try out their new vehicle on a trip to Washington State.

	Then, maybe, finally, Edward--even the kids on his school bus call him Edward--will be able to let go of the memories that have haunted him and this little farm and ranch community of 5,000 for a decade.

	The memories are so mixed--despite a bookcase full of trophies, plaques, letters of appreciation (including one from President Ford) and good words spoken of Ray for the Congressional Record. No one brought them up at the cake and coffee party that marked his retirement. And the 10th anniversary of the harrowing event that made Ray and this quiet village famous was allowed to pass without fanfare last Tuesday.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/383018551/?terms=%22Edward%2BRay%2BDay%22
	18 Jul 1976

	...Ray is a humble man, a resident of Chowchilla since 1921 who was born in the nearby town of Le Grand.

	...After countless interviews and questions from hundreds of newspersons and after only 1 1/2 hours of sleep, Ray consented to still another interview.

	...He seemed a little embarrassed when told the townspeople are planning a "Frank Edward Ray Day" to honor th man they credit with saving their children.

	How does it feel to be a hero? "I don't know," he answered, turning the conversation to the "good people" in law enforcement who helped the rescue efforts.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/15448155/?terms=Chowchilla
	17 Jul 1976

	'He's the best'

	Bus driver proves hero

	CHOWCHILLA, Calif. (UPI) -- "Mr. Ray, he's the best," chanted a group of children when asked who their favorite bus driver was.

	Frank Ray Jr., 55, is also a real homespun hero today after digging himself and 26 children from a cavern prison near Livermore, Calif.

	...Ray, his bright blue eyes flashing, said he did most of the digging that freed the children and himself from a cavern at the bottom of a rock quarry where they had been left 16 hours earlier by gunmen.

	"I'd crawl up there and dig for awhile. I had plenty of water. I'd go back and get some water, splash it over my face and I'd go back up and dig some more."


http://www.mercedsunstar.com/news/local/community/chowchilla/article9308183.html?fb_comment_id=697011047075617_697094400400615
	Chowchilla hero to be honored

	A park in Chowchilla will be renamed later this month in honor of Ed Ray, the unassuming bus driver who made national news when he helped free 26 kidnapped students.

	The city of Chowchilla and Ray’s family are planning a ceremony near where Sonoma Avenue meets the 625 North 15th Street park at 4 p.m. Feb. 26, which would have been Ray’s 94th birthday. He died in 2012, grabbing headlines as news outlets around the country remembered him as a hero.

	...Glen Ray, 69, said he appreciates the city’s effort to honor his father, though he noted his father never considered himself a hero.

	“My father was a very simple man. He never thought that this was a heroic act,” he said. “This was his job. These kids were entrusted in his care, and it’s his job to get them home safely.”


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1986-07-20/features/8602220197_1_school-bus-bus-driver-chowchilla
	``People feel they`ve closed the door on a bad experience,`` the editor of the local Chowchilla News told a visiting reporter. ``And they want to keep it closed.``


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1986-07-20/features/8602220197_1_school-bus-bus-driver-chowchilla/4
	...Jodi Heffington, now 20, is a beautician in Chowchilla and won`t talk about the kidnaping. One of the four Cerrejo girls on the bus, Irene Reimer, now 21, married, and working at the local hospital, says, ``It`s just a bad dream; we don`t want to talk about it.``

	Pretty Cindy Van Hoff, 17, an honor student who won nine varsity letters, got her diploma in June. She shrugs off her memories, ``There`s nothing to be learned from it. It was just a freak thing.`` Many students refuse to talk about the incident at all, to the point of angrily lecturing reporters who call. ``Look, we didn`t ask to be famous,`` one said. ``Let us alone.``


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1986-07-20/features/8602220197_1_school-bus-bus-driver-chowchilla
	``Chowchilla. . . . Whenever I tell a stranger that`s where I`m from, a quizzical look comes across their face,`` says former Mayor Jim Dumas. ``And then they remember. `Oh, yes,` `` he says slowly, unconsciously mimicking the slow, dawning of recognition on such a stranger`s face. `` `The kidnaping.`

	...Principal Lee Roy Tatom recalls how puzzled he was when he got the first call from a worried parent: ``Hey, the little guy isn`t home yet.`` Tatom thought maybe the old bus had broken down along the road--Ray often had to fix the bus himself from parts he`d buy at Emmett McDonald`s auto supply.

	``I went out and traced Edward`s bus route. . . . When I`d gone over the whole thing east and west, I went back and went north and south. . . . I called the county police and asked if they`d seen a yellow school bus floating around, but . . . God, what could have happened? The whole thing was impossible to comprehend.``

	The one thing he didn`t worry about was Edward Ray. The man had been born in Chowchilla. Everybody knew his wife and his two boys and his grandchildren. Some of the kids on the bus were the grandkids of his own school classmates. Others were the children of kids he`d driven years before. Everybody in town knew the bashful, balding man with the ready smile.

	...Despite an air tube, suffocation was a real possibility. Ray admits that he cried as well as prayed, and he tried to keep the children calm. When they moved around, the timbers and wires would creak and groan. Several times, Ray thought the severely stressed roof would cave in on them.

	What happened next is still subject to debate. In the weeks afterward, Mike Marshall, the oldest boy on the bus, later claimed that it was he who started digging the kids out. Some of the other children, but by no means all, recalled it that way, too. Marshall, then 14, was was the son of a rodeo cowboy. His dad was up at the Calgary Stampede, competing. Mike had to stay home for the summer to make up credits in summer school. Usually he spent his afternoons practicing with his lasso and dreaming of cowboying. He wasn`t even supposed to be on the bus the day of the kidnaping, but his mom had gotten mad at him that morning and made him stay at school and ride home with the littler kids as punishment.

	``He was a skinny little guy,`` Ray recalls now, with a smile. ``He was one of those boys who smoked and dipped Copenhagen snuff. The janitor`d catch `em. You could smell it when he got on the bus.``


https://www.newspapers.com/image/30719036/
	14 Nov 1976

	In a town divided, Chowchilla now asks: Who was the hero?

	By MICHAEL COAKLEY

	...It could be any American farm town approaching Thanksgiving, its blessings apparent to the most casual observer.

	But Chowchilla is not just any town, and the crime the four months ago brought it lasting notoriety has left some deep scars, so deep that some of its people doubt they will ever heal.

	The 26 children who were kidnaped off their school bus and shoved into a quarry pit for nearly 17 hours are back in their classrooms now. The bus driver, Ed Ray, is off the celebrity circuit and back on his old route.

	But nothing is really normal again. Several of the children suffer psycological after-effects: many of the parents are resentful that so much attention has been centered on Ray; Ray, in turn, is embittered toward the parents; and throughout the community there is fear, also a touch of greed.

	"I don't think we'll ever get over this thing completely; there are just too many problems," said Mayor Jim Dumas. "The best we can do is put it out of our minds as much as possible and get on with living."

	...And in Chowchilla, the victims of the abduction and their families are finding that memories of the ordeal simply won't fade, partyl because of the massive publicity that continues to envelop of the the century's most bizarre crimes.

	Ray has become a folk hero, honored by countless public officials and service clubs as the man responsible for digging the children out of the pit and saving their lives. Two weeks ago he made a guest appearance on the TV game show "Hollywood Squares."

	All this fawning over Ray has grated on some parents. While expressing gratitude toward the stocky, 55-year-old driver for keeping the children calm during their joint captivity, many townspeople are convinced the biggest hero was actually Mike Marshall, a lanky 14-year-old who tugged for five hours to free the group while Ray, according to some of the children, at one point tried to discourage him from continuing.

	"I don't understand why the media isn't paying more attention to Mike Marshall and the other kids who played such a big role," said one of the parents privately. "I guess it's just easier to make a hero out of a father figure, but I do think the children feel neglected and cheated, and this aggravates the whole problem."

	...Marshall, the oldest of the children held captive, said he first got the idea of attempting an escape soon after the group had stopped hearing sounds from above, indicating the kidnapers had left the quarry site.

	"I started digging, and Ed Ray took me over in the corner and told me it was no use, that we weren't going to get out of there and we'd just have to kick the bucket," Marshall recalled. "I was stunned when he said that, but after a little while I started digging again."

	Eventually, he added, Ray did assist in pushing away the heavy metal plate that the kidnapers had used to cover the hole. Marshall believes he could not have moved the plate without the driver.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149632
	16 Jan 1983

	...[Mike] said he no longer has the bad dreams but he said that when he thinks back to July, 1976, "it's scary. I mena, I remember how scared I was. When Ed Ray told me that we were going to die if we stayed down there, kick the bucket, that right there is what made me want to dig out. I figured if I was going to die down there, then I might as well die trying to dig out. Because he (Ray) was an adult, I thought he knew what he was talking about.

	...Mike said he sometimes looks back on the time in the buried truck-trailer and he marvels at what he and Robert Gonzales accomplished. "I don't think I could do it right now--if I didn't think I was going to die. It's like the story you hear of the kid lifting the car off his dad. It got his adrenalin flowing. It was kind of like that."


https://www.newspapers.com/image/30719036/
	Two other children who were in the quarry confirmed Marshall's story. "It was Mike's idea to start digging, I remember that for sure." said 11-year-old Jeff Brown. His 9-year-old sister, Jennifer, complained that Ray has been honored too much and that he had resigned himself to not escaping. "He said why bother to try and get out of there: we were going to die there and we should save our strength," she recollected.

	Marshall's mother does not join those who criticize Ray. "I really was angry about it for a long time, because I do think Mike was the real hero; but if this fame is what Ed needs, then I think we should let him have it," she said. "Besides, the nation needed a hero, and I guess a 14-year-old boy just wouldn't do."

	Ray himself is hurt by the comments of the parents. Standing by his bus in front of the Dairyland School waiting for the children to come out -- as he did on that humid day in July -- the man could not hide his anger.

	"I'm going over there and straighten out that kid Marshall one of these days, but people tell me I oughtn't do it when I'm mad," he said.

	"I'm the one that god those kids out of that hole, and I don't know why everybody's going around lying about it. Some of these damn parents won't even let me talk to their kids now. They think I'm getting too much credit, and that it was the kids that did it all."

	Acknowledging that there were things he would have done differently in hindsight, he added: "I thought I did pretty good just getting everybody out of there."

	Mayor Dumas admits there has been some resentment of Ray in Chowchilla. "And frankly, I think it's totally unjustified," he added. "I'm convinced those kids never would have been freed if it hadn't been for Ed Ray."


https://www.newspapers.com/image/42432147/?terms=mike%2BMarshall%2BChowchilla
	02 Jul 1977

	By Joseph N. Bell

	...The Marshalls are at the center of a controversy that has divided Chowchilla deeply. Mike hopes to collaborate with a local reporter on a book that will state that it was Mike and not Ed Ray, the bus driver, who was responsible for digging the children out of their underground prison.

	Carol enlarges, uneasy but determined. "It's caused some dissension here. I know that. But I think a lot of people are now regretting some things that happened after the kidnapping. The public made a big thing of it all over the world. Then there was this big letdown afterward when all the recognition and credit went to one person. This picture of one adult leading the kids out simply wasn't so, at least from the point of view of many of the kids. Each one of the kids thinks he or she played a big part in getting out -- even if they didn't do anything physically."

	Ed Ray, a stocky, barrel-chested man with the calloused hands of a manual worker, still drives his Chowchilla school bus daily. "There's some awful far-out stories being told," he said to me. "Like in some of those stories, the boys done all the work, and I didn't do nothing but lay down there in that hole and pray. I don't think that's fair to me."

	Ray said he heard from several motion picture producers, and had signed a 90-day option with one. He now doubts anything will ever come of the whole matter, however. "Now, I'm just back to the same old routine, driving my bus and going my other work. For a long while I was thinking about it all the time. Now that's pretty well stopped -- till somebody brings it up like right now, and then it starts all over again."

	An Ed Ray Retirement Fund and a Scholarship Fund for the children were established...


https://www.newspapers.com/image/383457386/?terms=mike%2BMarshall%2BChowchilla
	23 Aug 1976

	...He and Gonzales, along with Ray, will be individually honored for the first time Wednesday in Madera by state Atty. Gen. Evelle J. Younger. The awards will be the first presented solely to children involved in the kidnaping.

	"Frankly, Mike is disappointed and so am I "about the lack of personal recognition given the youngsters who aided in the rescue, Marshall's mother, Carolyn, said.

	The two returned Sunday from Idaho for the celebration. They had been accompanying Mike's father, who is on the rodeo circuit.

	"I'm not very happy with the way they are ignoring the children. Mike knew it would happen and that's one reason he didn't want to come today," Mrs. Marshall said.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149632
	..."My dad, as soon as I got out of there, he told me, he said, 'A lot of people are going to tell you that God got you out of that hole. But He didnt. You got out of it.'"


https://www.newspapers.com/image/383457386/?terms=mike%2BMarshall%2BChowchilla
	Mike pointed out that it was Gonzales who first broke through into open air after digging out of the van--and he (Mike), who first climbed to freedom.

	"I was scared to go out there," he said. "I didn't know if the kidnapers were still there..."

	Mike had nothing but praise for Ray.

	But he said a "lot of the news reports of this things--how we got out and all--are wrong. We were the ones, Robert and me, who wanted to start digging. Not Mr. Ray. Ed didn't want us to try to get out because he thought the kidnapers were still out there."

	Mike said he decided several times to try and dig his way out, despite Ray's objections. "We started digging again," he said, "because the other kinds wanted us to."

	Gonzales supported young Marshall's story. "It was the kids--Mike and me--who kept trying," he said. "It's nothing against Mr. Ray. He helped us, kept us cool by dousing us with water. But everyone seems to have the idea that he did the whole thing alone."

	Several parents agreed the children were not getting enough credit.

	"The kids don't understand why they were pushed into the background on this thing," said John D. Brown III, who had two children on the bus.

	But it was his daughter, Jennifer Brown, who made a special presentation to Ray from the children as a group at the climax of the ceremonies at the fairgrounds.

	There was one indication during the ceremony that Mike Marshall's special efforts had not been entirely overlooked.

	The names of the kidnaped children were read and the audience had been asked to hold their applause until the end. But when Marshall's name was read, there was applause from many of the parents.

	It wasn't much.

	But it was something, and later Sheriff Ed Bates said he had personally recommended that Younger present the special awards to Marshall, Gonzales and Ray.

	All in all, it was a gala day for everyone--and especially for Ray.

	"I don't really feel like a hero," he said. "But for the past month, everybody has been telling me that I am. . ."

	...But a local clergyman helped put the whole thing in perspective:

	"It could easily have been a different story," he said. "Instead of having this celebration, today could have been a day of mourning. We have that to be thankfull for.

	"Beside this fact, nothing else is really to important . . ."


https://lasvegassun.com/news/1999/jul/15/las-vegan-mike-marshall-remembers-his-role-helping/
	Las Vegan Mike Marshall remembers his role helping children escape the terrifying Chowchilla kidnapping

	Lisa Ferguson

	Thursday, July 15, 1999

	Did he or didn't he?

	It's the question that has trailed Las Vegan Mike Marshall for more than two decades.

	Was he -- on July 15, 1976, at age 14 -- responsible for conceiving and implementing a plan that saved the lives of 25 youngsters who, along with himself and a school bus driver, were buried alive for more than a dozen hours in a moving-van trailer by a trio of gun-toting kidnappers in Chowchilla, Calif.?

	Or should credit have gone to the school bus driver, Ed Ray, who reportedly helped Marshall and some of the other boys execute the escape?

	The debate continues today, 23 years after the much-publicized crime landed the small, central-California farming community in the media spotlight.

	In the first few years following the kidnapping Marshall -- a longtime rodeo rider who these days divides his time between his home in East Las Vegas and a construction job in Phoenix -- couldn't have cared less whether his heroics were lauded.

	But as time passes, and peoples' queries about the events of the kidnapping continue, 37-year-old Marshall wonders if the truth will ever be known.

	"I thought during the years that it really didn't bother me," he says by phone from Phoenix.

	Having competed on the professional rodeo circuit from 1980-92 (and being the son of rodeo rider Bob Marshall), he says people in that industry were familiar with his story as a victim of the Chowchilla school bus kidnapping.

	But occasionally news programs and magazines will profile Ray, who subsequently purchased the Dairyland School bus involved in the kidnapping.

	"They'd see (Ray) on some tabloid show and they'd say, 'They didn't even mention (Marshall's) name,' " he says.

	To hear Marshall tell his version of the events -- he was the subject of a People magazine profile and a feature on NBC's "Dateline" this spring -- it would seem the then-teenager took it upon himself to bring the schoolchildren, Ray and himself back alive.

	...For all the children and Ray knew, they had been left to die.

	Marshall says the 27 victims were forced to rely on a single air vent. Some rations -- water and a bit of food -- and a few mattresses and box springs and a pair of crude toilets were provided. Meanwhile the trailer's roof began to collapse from the weight that had been placed upon it.

	As Marshall tells it, "The bus driver totally freaked out. He told me it looked like we were gonna have to stay down there and kick the bucket. ... I noticed he wasn't handling the situation very good, but I thought, 'Well, if this guy thinks we're gonna kick the bucket, what the heck am I doing down here?' "

	At that point, Marshall says, he kicked apart one of the box springs and used pieces of its wooden frame to wedge up the iron plate covering the hole far enough to get his fingers around it and move it out of the way. Then he claims to have moved the truck batteries and crawled inside the plywood box (actually five pieces of wood that were not nailed together).

	Using a piece of wood, he dug at the plywood until he created a hole; dirt began falling down the sides and inside the trailer. He figures the process took six or seven hours.

	"I didn't know where I was going or what I was doing," he recalls. "... And the whole time, the bus driver is yelling, 'Pretty please, don't hurt him, pretty please, don't hurt him. He don't know what he's doing.' He thought (the kidnappers) were still up there."

	Marshall thought they might have been, too. "I didn't really know what I was doing but I figured it was better than doing nothing. God, you know, Jesus or whatever gave me the power," he says.

	All the while, he says, the other children cheered him on, saying, "Go Mike. You can do it, Mike."

	Larry Park, 6 at the time, was one of them. He was on the bus that day with his 8-year-old sister, Andrea.

	"Mike was the one (who) initially started digging. Mike was the one (who) took the initiative," Park, now 29 and living near California's Yosemite National Park, says.

	Marshall says he was finally able to move the the top panel of the box enough to get his fingers underneath it and lift it up, exposing the group once again to the outside world.

	"I didn't even hesitate, I just stuck my head up through (the hole) and (saw that) we were in the mountains," he says. "There were trees and stuff. It was great not seeing anybody there, too."

	Soon after, he says, Ray began handing him the children from the trailer. After they were all outside, Ray came up through the hole and pulled Marshall out last.

	As the rest of the group headed toward the rock quarry, Marshall says he ran into the nearby woods. "I thought, 'Everybody's out, but if these guys are hanging around here, and if they're gonna get them, at least I'll be free to get some help or whatever.' "

	Marshall says he stayed in the woods for about 30 minutes, until he saw police helicopters and SWAT officers approaching, and figured it was safe to join the others.

	So, what exactly was Ray's role in the mechanics of the escape?

	According to Park, "Ed Ray was pretty much a lost cause" inside the trailer. "He basically had his head in his hands and was pretty much mumbling to himself, saying we were gonna die. He didn't give us much of a chance, really."

	Ray denied such claims in a People magazine article earlier this year. Sarcastically, he said, "Oh yeah, (Marshall) done it all, I cried boo-hoo and didn't do nothing." (Attempts to reach Ray for comment for this article were unsuccessful.)

	Park admits, "Once Mike started making some headway Ed Ray joined in. I guess in his own right, Ed Ray is kind of a hero, because without him we probably never could have gotten the (iron plate) up high enough for Mike to scoot the batteries off of it. He was there towards the end of it with Mike."

	Still, "If it wasn't for Mike, we'd probably still be down there," he says. "Mike's my hero."

	San Francisco psychologist Dr. Lenore Terr has interviewed most of the Chowchilla kidnapping victims as part of an on-going study, the results of which are scheduled to be released in two years, on the 25th anniversary of the crime. She also penned a book, "Too Scared to Cry" (Basic Books, 1992), about the subject.

	Terr says that during her interviews the children were "virtually unanimous in mentioning two boys, Mike Marshall being the leader of those boys, who dug them out and who got the idea of digging them out." (She did not divulge the name of the second boy.)

	...When the children and Ray arrived safely back in Chowchilla -- some 30 hours after they had been abducted -- they found themselves in the midst of a media frenzy. Reporters from throughout the country had converged on the town and tied up phone lines so that even the kidnappers had been unable to place a call to demand their ransom.

	The media, Marshall says, "jumped on me and I started telling them what happened." But, he says, the Dairyland School's principal, Lee Roy Tatom, and Marshall's father quickly called them off.

	Marshall instead spent the next few days retelling his tale to FBI officials. "It was kind of weird because they didn't really want to talk to anyone else, just me."

	But as soon as his interrogation was through Marshall says he headed out of town with his father -- passing on the town picnic and trip to Disneyland that were awarded to the other kidnapping victims.

	A press conference was held the day after the kidnapping victims returned, where Ray explained the events to reporters. Tatom oversaw the gathering.

	"That's the time that Ed explained what happened, but I don't remember him telling (reporters) that he was the one responsible" for orchestrating the escape, Tatom says. "I don't recall Ed saying, 'I did this' or 'I did that.' "

	In fact, Tatom says "there's no doubt in my mind that Ed Ray" was responsible for the executing the escape.

	"They type of person he is, the man that he is ... it took a lot of power and a lot of muscles to do such" heavy lifting, Tatom says. While he doesn't doubt the children helped in the escape, he says, "I think because of Ed Ray that things came out a lot better than if an adult had not been there."

	Marshall says it seemed like the media "ran with this Ed Ray thing without even finding out what happened. It was like there was nothing I could really do."

	...He says he "very seldom" thinks about the kidnapping or his heroic efforts. His fiance, Sherry Bozek, recently reminded him: " 'You saved these kids' lives. They wouldn't be alive today' " if it wasn't for him.

	"I don't think of myself as a hero at all," he says. "I think that God had me in (the trailer) for a reason, and anybody else probably would have done the same thing."

	Nor does Marshall resent the attention Ray has received over the years for his reported role in the escape.

	"It just kind of blows me away," he says. The kidnapping has been "like his whole life, and it was the last thing in my life that I wanted to remember. So, I figure one day he's gonna have to answer for it and I really try not to judge."

	So he did what he could: He tried to forget. "I don't know, I didn't think anybody really cared," he says.


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1986-07-20/features/8602220197_1_school-bus-bus-driver-chowchilla
	Whoever started digging out--Ray says it was him--what certainly did happen was that Ray, with the help of Marshall and other boys, stacked the mattresses to the ceiling and used wooden slats they knocked out of bedsprings to pry a narrow opening. Ray managed to reach up and inch off the two massive tractor batteries holding down the heavy steel plate. ``I was about give out,`` Ray says with a shake of his head. ``I worked a ranch all my life, and that week I`d been bucking baled hay--(throwing on a wagon) 140-, 160-pound bales, but that plate was heavy. I tried laying on my back and pushing at it with my legs.`` He and Mike poured water on their heads to keep from fainting with heat and exhaustion.

	In interviews after the kidnaping, Mike Marshall conceded that he could never have gotten the huge plate off by himself, but his mother maintained,

	``I do think Mike was the real hero; but if this fame is what Ed needs, then I think we should let him have it. Besides, the nation needed a hero and I guess a 14-year-old boy just wouldn`t do.``

	Ray, Marshall and two other boys sweated and strained for four or five hours in the stifling heat near the ceiling of their tomb. Finally, about 8 p.m., more than 16 hours after they`d been buried, 28 hours after they`d been abducted, they broke through, and Ray led his woozy pack of swimsuit-clad kids to the nearest structure--a maintenance shed at a nearby quarry. A stunned worker called the sheriff and gave Ray, dressed only in his cowboy boots and undershorts, a pair of coveralls.

	...In those first weeks after the kidnaping, some wonderful things happened. The Lions Club of Buena Vista, Calif., sent Ray, all the kids and their parents to Disneyland. Mayor Dumas recalls that trip. ``Wherever Edward Ray was there`d be children hanging on him. There was a kinship there that was out of the ordinary. He`s a wonderful person.`` Chowchilla threw a parade and an ``Edward Ray and the Children Appreciation Day.`` Money came in from all over the country for a retirement fund for Ray and a scholarship fund for the kids.

	Then it was all over--to the world, but it wasn`t all over at all for Chowchilla. ``My whole life is consumed by it,`` Joan Brown whose 8-year-old Jennifer and 11-year-old Jeff were on the bus, said a few months after the kidnaping. ``I quit my job. I relive it and relive it. The children suffer nightmares.`` Interviewed again last week, she said that hardly a day goes by that she doesn`t think about the terror.

	...Joan Brown said back then, ``You walk into a store to buy a magazine with a `Chowchilla` story in it and the storekeeper says, `Boy I wish they`d drop it.` Maybe people are saying this to us. We`ve been called publicity hounds.`` Mayor Dumas was quoted then saying, ``Some folks feel like the parents won`t let it die. There`s been a change in this town. I don`t understand it.`` A lot of people, Ed Ray and former Mayor Dumas included, now blame much of the aftermath on the press. ``As soon as you people stopped coming, why that took care of it,`` Dumas said a week before this week`s anniversary. He said it nicely. He likes reporters.

	What Dumas is referring to is a nasty spat of rumors that suggested Ray hadn`t done all he might have to save the kids, or done it soon enough, or done it without prodding from two of the older boys on the bus, though they all came out alive. Most of the rumors, it seemed to locals, started with reporters`questions. ``They`d get one kid or parent over here and ask one thing, then get somebody else over there and say `Well, this person says this and such,``` Ray says, his soft voice suddenly hard-edged. At its peak, the hoard of press numbered 320 there at one time; but over the next several weeks, 500 reporters would pass through town -- one for every 10 residents.


https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149632
	January 16 1983

	...While Robert appears intact emotionally today, he remembers the kidnaping and escape down to the last detail and can recite even the words spoken in the dungeon as if they were engraved in his memory.

	He remembers Ed Ray repeating again and again, "I want to see my grandchildren once more. I want to see my grandchildren once more."


https://www.newspapers.com/image/30719036/
	..."It was Mike's idea to start digging, I remember that for sure." said 11-year-old Jeff Brown. His 9-year-old sister, Jennifer, complained that Ray has been honored too much and that he had resigned himself to not escaping. "He said why bother to try and get out of there: we were going to die there and we should save our strength," she recollected.


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1986-07-20/features/8602220197_1_school-bus-bus-driver-chowchilla
	``We were the biggest story of 1976,`` Dumas says. ``Most of the reporters were very polite. Nice folks individually. But most didn`t understand little towns. Within a two week period, we were no longer front page news every place in the world; and when the press started leaving us alone the bad feelings subsided.``

	Except Ed Ray`s feelings. ``Oh, I got over it,`` he says, but his wife, who has been wrapping fried chicken for the refrigerator of their neat farm home as she listens, disagrees. ``I don`t know you`re over it. It still bothers you,`` she interjects.

	Then she explains to a visitor, ``I know a lot of nights he still doesn`t sleep. I know when things are bothering him. He`ll go along for awhile, then it`ll come back. It has been very hard on him.``

	``What hurt more than the kidnaping,`` Ray says now, ``was the talk the parents might sue me. When I`d go into town, somebody`d tap me on the shoulder and say `I hear you are getting sued.` Everything was in my name--the house, the farm; and I was helping my two boys get started farming. We`d have lost everything.``

	...There were two quickie books written and talk of others. A self-described movie producer showed up and tried to sign everyone involved to a movie deal but not everyone would sign. Last year, HBO announced it would be making a movie; Edward Ray says he doesn`t think it`s ever going to happen.

	If it did, Lee Roy Tatom thinks Ray would be the perfect hero. ``Oh, I know Edward didn`t do it all himself. But he was the leader. He was calm and mature. I`d like to believe all my bus drivers or anybody could have done what he did, but in hindsight I`m glad it was Edward Ray on that bus. If you wrote the story as a book, you`d want Edward and a happy ending.``




kidnapping survivor Larry Park book on event:


https://books.google.com/books/about/The_Chowchilla_Kidnapping_Why_Me.html?id=SFJPvgAACAAJ
	The Chowchilla Kidnapping: Why Me?: Revised Edition

	...Jul 26, 2016

	...Mike Marshal is my hero. He was fourteen when we were kidnapped, a big kid and quite strong. His dad was a rodeo rider, and I'm sure Mike himself worked outdoors quite a bit moving hay and riding horses and stuff. For a fourteen-year-old kid to have the gumption to stand up and say no to Death takes a lot of courage. He knew what he was going to do might get him killed, but he took the ultimate step for twenty-seven people to survive . . . to live. I don't know what would have happened that day if Mike hadn't been there, but I do know that, because he *was* there, I am here on Earth to write this book.

	"Let me see the light, Mr. Ray." Mike's voice seemed to come from far away. Ed Ray turned the light on and handed it to Mike. Shining the light upward, he took a long look at the steel plate covering the hole.

	"I've tried the plate, Mike. It's too heavy to move."

	...They were sitting together on top of the matresses with the flashlight shining on the cover talking about the objects on top of the plate and what they were going to do to move them. "I can't move whatever they are, Ed Ray. I can't keep my balance, and they're just too heavy."

	Ed Ray must have begun losing heart, because he started talking as if their efforts were futile. I overheard him tell Mike it might be better to wait and see if the men came back.

	"And what if they don't come back? What if they've left us here to die?" Mike didn't want to give up.

	But Ed Ray was done. He told Mike sometimes it's better to just accept their defeat. Fatigue, feat, frustration, all had to be taking their toll on him. I know *I* didn't feel very hopeful about our situation. I didn't think I would ever see Mom or Dad again. How did he feel as he sat there thinking about his wife? I don't know what he thought during our hours of captivity, but I *do* know the despair hopelessness brings, and I don't blame him for anything he said during those worst of moments.

	"We have to keep on trying Mr. Ray. We can't just let ourselves die in here, and I can't do this alone. Please help me." Mike was desperate. He knew we had to get out of the hole and that he was going to need Ed Ray's help to make it happen.

	Ed Ray just didn't have it in him to continue going though, and just sat in the corner waiting for whatever was going to happen.

	...they pushed and lifted the plate again, higher this time. Mike pushed on the batteries some more and was able to make them move a little, but it took so long to get them to budge that, once again the two boys, in their fatigue, let the lid fall back into place.

	Ed Ray looked at the boys as they sat to rest. He said they should stop before one of them got hurt or the men came back and they got themselves in trouble. It was just too risky to keep going.

	"We can't stop. We have to get out of here. If you'd help us, we could get the plate off." Ed Ray shook his head, but Mike pressed his point. "Ed Ray, I know you're tired, I am too. But we can't just give up. Not yet." They needed Ed Ray's added strength to get the plate higher. Escape was our only chance for survival and Mike knew it. He looked at Ed Ray hopefully.

	"Okay," Ed Ray spoke in a heavy sigh. "Let's give it one more try. We'll see what we can do."


Ray's account:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/98252946/
	Bus Driver Tells of Kidnap, Terror, Escape

	BY ALTON SLAGLE

	New York News
	
	..."They had this building (the truck trailer) all lined with big ol' mesh wire. They stood on the outside and we could hear them cutting the wires and the ceiling started to cave in. We thought we were gonna' have it right then. We kept beggin' them to let us out.

	"In the afternoon we never did hear 'em cutting the wires no more, so me and a couple of the boys decided we'd better start diggin. When we started to move this steel plate, we couldn't hardly move it because it had two great big ol' batteries on top of it. One of the batteries I couldn't even lift myself. I had to get the kids to help me. We had to pile up mattresses and stuff to get as close enough to the whole to get out.

	"They had another big box filled about 30 inches high. They had dirt piled on each side and the top and we couldn't start to move it. It's just lucky we had a short block of wood in a thing there they had for a brace, and we used it to pry.

	"We'd throw water over our heads to try to cool off and go up and dig some more. I'd say it was about 7 o'clock we got dug out. I handed the kids up to the other boys and we got out. Just lucky enough there was a gravel pit there within 200 feet of us and there was a man over there so we told him what happened. He went and called the sheriff, and the sheriffs and the fire trucks and everything else came and we had a big crowd and we all got home safe."

	...The abductors had cut small hoes in the metal sides of the 8- by 16-foot prison so that the children could have a toilet of sorts. But the air inside was stifling, and, Ray said, it became increasingly difficult to breathe.

	He said the kidnappers said nothing to him except to ask his name and, "I never did as much as hear 'em speak to one another."

	But the frightened children made up for it, "and I just talked to 'em and begged 'em not to holler and scream that we're gonna' try to get out of here."

	...When they started cutting the wire mesh, and the dirt started caving in, Ray became fearful that the men meant to kill their prisoners. "That's the only thing I thought about," he said.


kidnap survivor Lynda Carrejo-Labendeira interview:

https://www.npr.org/2012/05/22/153308664/school-bus-driver-who-saved-students-was-a-hero
	Many of the children trapped in the bus stayed in touch with Ed Ray, even visited him in his final days at the nursing home.

	LYNDA CARREJO-LABENDEIRA: He had the lives of 26 children that he loved and cared about in his hands. He was the hero.

	...CORNISH: Masked gunmen drove Ed Ray and the 26 kids to a rock quarry about 100 miles away. They forced the group into a storage trailer, which was then buried underground. The kidnappers planned to ask for a $5 million ransom. Lynda Carrejo-Labendeira remembers how Ray and some of the older kids found an opening in the trailer and began to dig their way out.

	CARREJO-LABENDEIRA: Edward was down in there and he was right up there digging 'til he cut his hands and his forehead and there were no tools to dig with, so he - they had to makeshift whatever they could find around them. And I remember Edward being cut and pouring water on his hands and helping clean them. That was, you know, the best I knew how to do.

	CORNISH: After 16 nerve-wracking hours underground, the children and Ray managed to dig their way out unharmed. The three kidnappers were caught weeks later and sentenced to life in prison. They remain behind bars today. Lynda Carrejo-Labendeira says all these years later it was important to stay in touch with her old bus driver, Ed Ray.

	CARREJO-LABENDEIRA: It's when you go through an ordeal together, you don't even have to talk about the ordeal ever again and we really didn't. We knew what happened and it was just an unsaid thing that you knew happened and that you knew that was your hero. But also, growing up, becoming a responsible adult is when I really realized the true hero that he was.

	CORNISH: In what way?

	CARREJO-LABENDEIRA: Setting the tone of the whole ordeal, just being the role model for all of us, keeping us calm and not overreacting or acting against what the kidnappers were doing. He was calm. He was a positive presence. He was comforting. He was caring. He was kind.

	...CORNISH: Did it feel like you guys had a sort of responsibility to him, I mean, collectively in the community?

	CARREJO-LABENDEIRA: I don't know that it felt so much that way. I think we just - it was something that happened. There's a great pride, more so than anything else. We knew he was our hero. We knew he was our legend and it just took a lot of a humble, peaceful man to lead and to have - at this point in my life, realizing how incredibly much of a hero that he really was.


https://people.com/archive/school-bus-kidnapping-the-memories-never-stop-vol-78-no-13/
	Driver Ed Ray, who died May 17 at age 91, emerged as a hero, rallying the children and directing their escape.

	Medrano

	He was a courageous man. He kept 26 scared children in line and made us feel safe.

	Dailey

	We started stacking mattresses. Older kids started digging.

	Medrano

	We were as afraid to get out as to stay in; were they out there? After all of us were out, we started walking. [Finally] a man drove up and said, “Oh my God. You’re those kids.”


https://www.cnn.com/2015/11/19/us/rewind-chowchilla-school-bus-kidnapping/index.html
	Rebecca Reynolds

	God is good all the time love you Ed Ray

	Edward you will be forever my hero

	Love, Angie Robison

	Victims of the school bus kidnapping signed the bus after driver Edward Ray's death in 2012. Ray was hailed as a hero for helping the 26 children escape. 



From accounts, seems clear escape was team effort--kids cheered up Ray, and he, Marshall and Gonzoles worked together to help the rest of the kids out of the buried trailer.

Press gave all the credit to Ray, Mike Marshall and his parents gave all the credit to Marshall, and the press encouraged the fight.

Then Larry park published his book, first in July 2011 then a revised edition in 2016

book goes way over the top in writing Ray out of escape, basically says he didn't want to escape

contradicts other accounts, guessing what happened is Ray was worried kidnappers would be up there


then Park book has a lot of other anomalies:


https://read.amazon.com/?asin=B01LOPTFFU
	...The man holding the bag seemed to have a grin on his face as I took another step down the ladder, as if he were very pleased with himself for what he was doing. The woman just stood there with her hand resting on the arm of the man holding the bag. I wondered if she had children, and if she had put them in a hole too.

	...If this were a joke in any way, this is where they would tell me. Looking at each of them one more time, the images of masked, distorted, evil faces standing there above me were being burned into my brain. Never have I forgotten how those ghouls looked in that instant.

	...Standing on the ladder staring at the men, I waited for them to start laughing and say this was all a joke. Then I felt Ed Ray take hold of my foot and give a little tug.

	...Ed Ray kept his hands on the calves of my legs. With each step I took down the ladder, his steady hands were my guide. ...Ed Ray picked me off the ladder. He set me down, turned me to face, him, and gave he a long look up and down. "Are you okay?" he asked me quietly.

	...None of us said anything because we didn't want the kidnappers to get mad and hurt us as they were continually threatening to do. I could hear the kidnappers talking above us. They were talking so low the words sounded garbled, as if they were speaking a language only they understood. *Didn't demons have their own language?*

	...Ed Ray stood at the base of the ladder waiting and picked her off just as he had done me. As each child was retreived from the aldder, he would give them a gentle push toward the rest of us. I felt *so* very guilty as I watched her climbing into the hole; guilty because I should have done something to save her from this. She came to stand beside me. *She was there, and it was totally my fault! How could I have been such a chicken? How could I let here be trapped like this? Why didn't I run when I had the chance!?*

	"They took my purse," she told me softly. "Mom and Dad are going to be mad." That was my fault too.

	...The kidnappers pulled up the ladder and covered the hole. We were in the darkness again.

	"Hey!" Ed Ray called up. "This isn't all the kids! Were's the rest of the chidlren? What have you done to them?"

	The kidnappers yelled at him to shut up. They said something about the kids being there when they got there.

	...It only took moments for him to get to us. I felt his hand brush my shoulder as he reached out trying to touch each child in the dark. What thoughts had to be going through his mind? He had been driving us back and forth to school all summer. He had laughed with us often, admonished us when necessary, and cared for each of us individually. He knew each of our names, not as a bus route chart, but as individuals. He knew me even when he passed me on the sidewalk. He knew all of us that way.

	Now some of us were missing and he had no idea where they were. Was he saying each name to himself and remembering a smiling face? As he touched each of us who were there with him, was he counting the heads of those who weren't? I feared for those who were missing. Why weren't they there with us? I could feel Ed Ray's presence towing over our group as we stood there in the darkness, and I felt better for his nearness.

	Once he got to us, we crowded around him, hugging him and just trying to touch him simply for the contact. 

	...The cover was taken off the hole once again casting a dim circle of light onto the dirt covered floor. ...as each one stepped off the ladder he would give them a long look. I think he needed to reassure himself that each was whole and unharmed.

	...Then some of us heard the sound of wires snapping. Ping . . . ping. With each ping, the roof of our tomb came down a little more.

	...We children just kept screaming and begging for them to stop.

	Ping, ping, ping. The wires seemed to be singing our death song, a song of hopelessness and doom, and as the roof started falling, we all fell to the floor covering our heads with our arms. The roof was coming down, and we were going to die.

	...Ed Ray didn't have any answers to give, so he again gathered children around him and held us all in a huge hug.

	...I would like to believe what the kidnappers said later about them not leaving us to die, but I don't see how they were going to let us out from Canada where one of them was caught and another of them reportedly tried to go.

	Over the hole on top of the ground they put a piece of plywood and covered that with about eight inches of dirt and then brush, though we didn't know it at the time. Had someone walked right over the top of us, they would never have known it. We were gone. No one would ever see or hear from us again. We had been wiped off the face of the earth the way you grind a spider into the ground. We no longer existed for all intents and purposes.

	...It wasn't long before the smell in the tomb was matching that of being in the back of the van. All of us had to use our makeshift facilities and, one at a time, the curtain was raised to allow each of us in turn to do our business.

	...Ed Ray announced that he was going to be turning out the flashlight to save the batteries while we rested. Some of the children started sobbing again, and there were weak cires of "I want my Momma," and "I just wanna go home." Ed Ray kept going from bed to bed patting the children and speaking to us quietly as he soothed us each in turn.

	...I just wanted Mom and Dad. I just wanted to go home. *What did I do that was so wrong? Why were they punishing me? Did Mom and Dad say this was okay? I wanted my mom. I just wanted my mom!*

	...Not long after Mom and Dad arrived in town, Chowchilla lost electricity. The atmosphere in the house at Aunt Betty's tinged with chill as a feeling of evil seemed to shadow the house for a moment. Many of my aunts and uncles started praying for the Holy Spirit to come and reside with them through the storm.

	"The Devil's in this town tonight," my Aunt Katheryn said. "Satan's here, and God doesn't like it one bit."

	...The whispered singing didn't last long after that; we were still trying to be quiet in case the kidnappers got mad. You might imagine that singing "This Little Light of Mine" is slightly difficult in the pitch darkness of Hell. After a while, I could hear Ed Ray somewhere in the darkness. It sounded like he was crying or something and moaning that we were going to die. Andrea says she also remembers this very clearly.

	It seemed like an eternity that we sat there in the darkness wondering what was going to happen to us, wondering if the monsters would come back to let us out. Then Mike Marshal decided that, if he did have to die, he wasn't going to die without a fight. Enough is enough and he had apparently had just that.

	...Mom just knew we were out there somewhere. She knew we hadn't been taken off the earth, so we *must* be somewhere close by.

	...Mom tried to think about the whole thing analytically. *If they couldn't be hidden without a trace, then waht could've happened? They didn'tt ake the bus, so that means the kids must've been put into something else.

	...But what if they hadn't used a van? What if they'd used something else? What else could they have used to hide twenty-seven people? A semi-truk and trialer? No way. They could never have pulled a semi into and then out of the slough, and they didn't walkt those kids anywhere without leaving some kind of trakcs. How did they do this?* It was impossible to even contemplate. *What if it wasn't a human crime? What if it* was *space people like the authorities jokingly said?

	She tried to imagine Andrea and me flying in outer space with little green men. *Would they take them to far away stars? Would they show them all the different planets? Or would they use them for food? Would they feed them to their young? And how* absolutely ridiculous *was this line of thinking? There* were *no flying saucers, no little green men. There was no one in space wanting to eat her little girl and boy. Thoughts along those lines were absolutely idiotic, and a waste of time. My time's better spent trying to figure out how* men *had done this.


many passages in the book are puzzling

guess the guy has a lot of angst against his parents and Ed Ray

some parts contradict testimony of others, like one of perps being a woman, perps talking to them beyond asking for names

his attacks on Ed Ray and religiosity of Chowchilla residents mirror some of the propaganda in press--where did he get these ideas?

overall effect is to confuse reconstruction of what happened. seems to be motivated by animosity

seems like book didn't get favorable attention in press:

https://www.eastbaytimes.com/2011/07/14/chowchilla-kidnapping-victim-writes-book-2/
	Chowchilla kidnapping victim writes book

	...They escaped their would-be tomb by digging themselves out.

	Park was 6. Although he was not physically hurt, he said it left him with a lifetime of mental problems — from not being able to hold a job, to anger issues with his parents, to violent, gory zombie nightmares.

	“At 41 years, old I still sleep with a night light,” said Park, a Mariposa resident who briefly lived in Concord after the incident.

	Diagnosed with paranoid schizophrenia, he recently released a book he wrote to help with his healing: “The Chowchilla Kidnapping: Why Me?” — available electronically for $7.99 at www.smashwords.com/books/view/72803.

	Park said the book was for himself, but also to help others open up about trauma they might be holding inside.

	...Park said it was the second to last day of summer school, and they were returning from a trip to the town pool when men with guns, and stockings over their faces, stopped the bus. His sister, then 8, was also on the trip. Some thought it was a joke, but it wasn’t.

	“It was just dark and scary and I just wanted my mom,” Park said.

	On his second night home, he developed a voice in his head he named Mister. Making matters worse, he said the theory at the time was that the children would get over it easily. Instead, he said he grew to hate his parents and the rest of the world, thinking he had been abandoned and no one cared.

	His family moved to Concord, in an attempt to leave the memories behind. They moved to Mariposa when he was 10. At 12, at Mister’s urging, Park said he killed a chicken. It was the first of many animal killings, which he blamed on dogs. He said it gave him a sense of power.

	Park said his mother was afraid of his behavior and he was sent to foster care. There, he acted out, and at 17 was sent to the California Youth Authority, where he spent three years. Park said adult life has not been easy. His jobs have included being the manager of an apartment complex and at a handyman service, but he has not been able to hold them long, usually leaving when he gets upset. 

	...Park, who attends a nondenominational church that also focuses on sobriety, said he is too close to the case to decide if the perpetrators should be released from prison.

	At parole hearings he has attended, he said it is always mentioned that no one was harmed by the crime, which he doesn’t think is taking responsibility.

	However, he does pray for the kidnappers. On the 35th anniversary of the kidnapping, he plans to be with church leaders and ot sense of power.her close associates.

	“God bless them, because I can’t,” he said.


------




recap news coverage July 16:


AP:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/315175/?terms=Cowchilla

massive search, "life ceased its normal routine" in Chowchilla, 24 hours later no indication why they were kidnapped

Sheriff Bates said two sets of tracks on the bus tracks, suggesting an abudction "would have to be planned"

issued lookout for up to three vans travelling west

parents started calling late afternoon, some went to police station some went on search

FBI director director Kelly ordered Assistant FBI Director Gebhardt of LA office to "take personal charge" of the investigation


UPI:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/2387706/?terms=Chowchilla

open: fear mass kidnaping by radicals

first few paragraphs makes it sound like abducted before bus abandoned

more quotes saying "believe it was terrorists"

FBI and police "reluctant to label the disappearance an outright kidnapping"

nearly every van being stopped on main roads as result of police lookout issued

"There was no explanation of why the vans were being sought"

"dust patterns on the bus seats led authorities to believe the vehicle was empty at the time it was abandoned"

tracks from maybe two vechiles found beside bus tracks, maybe from hunters, heavy rain hampered investigation

checking out reports of van nearby, searched for van for a while but turned out to belong to fed dental program

"no legal basis" to call kidnapping and FBI agents not officially assigned to the case





conflicting:


July 16 AP:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/315175/?terms=Cowchilla
	Bates said his investigators found two sets of tracks superimposed on the bus tracks, suggesting that an abduction "would have to be planned, it seems to me." The tracks showed that "somebody left the area after the bus was parked."



July 16 UPI:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/2387706/?terms=Chowchilla
	At the scene investigators found swimming suits and towels in the abandoned bus. Dust patterns on the bus seats led authorities to believe the vehicle was empty at the time it was abandoned.

	...Tracks from perhaps two vehicles besides the bus were found at the scene, but a heavy rain during the night hampered investigation. Authorities said the area often is used by hunters, which might explain the tire tracks.



July 16 AP:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/315175/?terms=Cowchilla
	FBI Director ... Kelly said he has ordered Assistant FBI Director Robert E. Gebhardt of the Los Angeles FBI office to "immediately proceed to Chowchilla (Calif.) to take personal charge of the investigation."


July 16 UPI:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/2387706
	The FBI sent six agents to the scene from its Sacramento office, but Paul C. Young, special agent in charge, said there was no legal basis to declare the disappearance a kidnaping and that the agents were only offering assistance and were not officially assigned to the case.



UPI article tends to throw reader off what turned out to be facts of the case

bit that "tracks ... besides the bus were found at the scene" has to be a lie--in AP article said tracks were found on top of bus tracks, not beside them, and Bates walked through logic of how this means two vehicles left scene after bus left there. Given this, whole UPI article strange.




------




https://www.newspapers.com/image/15448155/?terms=Chowchilla
	17 Jul 1976

	CHOWCHILLA, Calif. (UPI) -- "Mr. Ray, he's the best," chanted a group of children when asked who their favorite bus driver was.

	Frank Ray Jr., 55, is also a real homespun hero today after digging himself and 26 children from a cavern prison near Livermore, Calif.

	The folks in his farming community of Chowchilla were certain all along that Ray was never involced in the bizzare abduction of a busload of Dairyland School children.

	"He's too reliable and well loved," said a mother awaiting her daughter before the Friday night's rescue. "If anything, he's out there fighting for those kids."

	The mother was right.

	Ray, his bright blue eyes flashing, said he did most of the digging that freed the children and himself from a cavern at the bottom of a rock quarry where they had been left 16 hours earlier by gunmen.

	...John Brown, an agriculture teacher at Chowchilla High School, had two children aboard the bus, Jeff, 10, and Jennifer, 9. "They'd go anywhere with that bus driver," he said. "He took a lot of their parents to school."

	..."There ain't a kid that dislikes him," added Marion. "He's wonderful with kids."




https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1977/11/03/chowchilla-kidnap-victims-tell-trial-of-fears-in-cave/9534e80b-31a0-4b65-8800-2764292ed353/?utm_term=.3485579d1640
	Jennifer Brown, a Chowchila kidnapping victim who said she is nine and amended it moments later to 10, testified yesterday about the lack of air in the cave in which she and 25 other children and their bus driver were once entombed.

	Sitting in a chair too large, with her feet dangling six inches from the floor, she said the air "started to disappear. It started to get hard to breathe."

	She was asked how she knew the air was disappearing, "Because Irene Carrejo (a 13-year-old kidnapping victim) told me it was."


WaPo doesn't want you to believe the children?


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1986-07-20/features/8602220197_1_school-bus-bus-driver-chowchilla/4
	Mike Marshall is rodeoing professionally, his dream. Jodi Heffington, now 20, is a beautician in Chowchilla and won`t talk about the kidnaping. One of the four Cerrejo girls on the bus, Irene Reimer, now 21, married, and working at the local hospital, says, ``It`s just a bad dream; we don`t want to talk about it.``

	Pretty Cindy Van Hoff, 17, an honor student who won nine varsity letters, got her diploma in June. She shrugs off her memories, ``There`s nothing to be learned from it. It was just a freak thing.`` Many students refuse to talk about the incident at all, to the point of angrily lecturing reporters who call. ``Look, we didn`t ask to be famous,`` one said. ``Let us alone.``


one way to get someone to not talk...


something on FBI files of case? https://prezi.com/8pz9fmotwzvf/fbi-case-chowchilla-school-bus-kidnapping/



https://www.ocregister.com/2016/03/04/prosecutor-opens-probe-into-pay-for-parole-allegations-in-school-1976-bus-hijacking/
	 Prosecutor opens probe into pay-for-parole allegations in school 1976 bus hijacking 

https://www.insideedition.com/headlines/15045-was-a-chowchilla-victim-paid-to-ask-for-kidnappers-parole
	 Was A Chowchilla Victim Paid to Ask For Kidnapper's Parole?

?


https://www.deseretnews.com/article/501744/AFTER-BUS-FULL-OF-KIDS-VANISHED-SPOTLIGHT-SHONE-ON-DUSTY-TOWN.html
	The town's lone police dispatcher was swamped with media calls as word of the kidnappings spread during the night. Someone estimated that 200 reporters came to cover the story. A New York Daily News staffer took a taxi 250 miles from Los Angeles.

	The crush of reporters overwhelmed telephone service in that pre-cellular era, resulting in busy signals on call after call from pay phones by the middle of the following day, July 16.

	The phone jam was so bad the kidnappers were unable to reach officials in Chowchilla to demand a $5 million ransom.

	...James Schoenfeld summed up the crime in a pre-sentencing interview:

	"The plan was simple in theory - kidnap a school bus, hold the occupants for ransom. The state pays us; we release the hostages. All our problems would be solved, and the state would be reimbursed by their insurance company.

	"Of course, everything did not go entirely as planned. The escape of the children and Mr. Ray, of course, was not in accordance with our plans." 


https://www.newspapers.com/image/384313544/?terms=Chowchilla%2BRay
	
Dr. William S. Kroger they guy who used "hypnosis" on Ray for license plate numbers


https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149570/?terms=Chowchilla%2BRay

https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149621/

https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149632

https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149646

https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149659

Creepy article by Jerry Cohen on emotional scars on children later (Jan 16 1983)





https://www.newspapers.com/image/389149632
	While Robert appears intact emotionally today, he remembers the kidnaping and escape down to the last detail and can recite even the words spoken in the dungeon as if they were engraved in his memory.

	He remembers Ed Ray repeating again and again, "I want to see my grandchildren once more. I want to see my grandchildren once more."


	...[Mike] He said he no longer has the bad dreams but he said that when he thinks back to July, 1976, "it's scary. I mena, I remember how scared I was. When Ed Ray told me that we were going to die if we stayed down there, kick the bucket, that right there is what made me want to dig out. I figured if I was going to die down there, then I might as well die trying to dig out. Because he (Ray) was an adult, I thought he knew what he was talking about.

	...Mike said he sometimes looks back on the time in the buried truck-trailer and he marvels at what he and Robert Gonzales accomplished. "I don't think I could do it right now--if I didn't think I was going to die. It's like the story you hear of the kid lifting the car off his dad. It got his adrenalin flowing. It was kind of like that."



https://www.newspapers.com/image/103938938/?terms=Chowchilla%2BRay

retrospective by Hal McWilliams who "broke" the Chowchilla kidnapping story


says personal friend of Sheriff Ed Bates, sounds like covering for himself a bit on account of how he broke the story after a call with Ed


	...THE NEXT MORNING at 10 am we all gathered at the Bank of America, the only institution in town at that time, located on the main drag. We felt if the kids were to be ransomed, maybe the banker would be called and the town would have to ransom the victims.

	No word came, but we found out later the culprits had desperately been trying to call Chowchilla to do the very thing we suspected they might do. They couldn't get through because phone lines were jammed by curious callers, somewhat like those who stop at the scene of auto accidents to gawk at the victims.


why was he at the bank of America?

kidnappers later claimed they were going to call local gov

articles that pushed "copying a book" theory pointed out Ray's brother worked at Chowchilla Bank of America--maybe related? could be reporters initially thought they were there to report on next "crime of the century," got cut short instead.

	
	...THE PITY OF IT is that the Schoenfelds and Woods are probably likeable fellows who made a brash and serious mistake with some callous disregard for the victims of their crime.

	They say they felt the victims were safely cared for in their underground prison, but authorities say the whole affair was just one step away from mass murder. Woods was sort of cocky in court. James Shconfeld tried a faint smile of bravado, but Richard was just plain scared and I guess he's been scared even since.



https://www.newspapers.com/image/60122277/?terms=Chowchilla%2BRay

reporting on court case psychologist says was impromptu decision to kidnap bus



1981 on lives after kidnapping, repeats phone lines thing:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/309767008/?terms=Chowchilla%2BRay


perps explain kidnapping 1981, quotes interview with them and victims in Fresno Bee:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/310736495/?terms=Chowchilla%2BRay


article about unreliability of memory in testimony making reference to Ray hypnosis:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/386840485


similar:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/387822479/?terms=Chowchilla%2BRay



https://www.newspapers.com/image/388308479/?terms=Chowchilla%2BMike%2BRay
	"In spite of all the publicity about oustanding police work, everyone knows damn well no one knew anything about what was happening," said Bates, who led much of the search for the victims and their abductors.

	"If they (the victims) hadn't dug themselves out of a hole, they could still have been there today."



another report on effects on children, less creepy than Cohen one:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/387023308/